<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89419-0039 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.4-19-89.f2.A1038</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 74 / Wednesday, April 19, 1989/ Proposed Rules <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of Child Support Enforcement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">45 CFR Parts 301, 302, 303, 304, 306, and 307</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 0970-AA16 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Standards for Program Operations </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE), HHS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This proposed regulation implements the requirementsof sections 121 and 122 of the Family Support Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-485)by revising current regulations to specify standards for processing childsupport enforcement cases and timeframes for distributing child supportcollections under title IV-D of the Social Security Act (the Act). By imposingrequirements and timeframes for taking appropriate actions and clarifyingor updating existing or vague timeframes and requirements, the proposedregulation would ensure that child support services are effectively andexpeditiously provided and that children receive the services they needand the support to which they are entitled. States would be required tomeet these standards by October 1, 1990. This regulation also responds to section 121(b) of Pub. L. 100-485 whichrequires consultation with an advisory committee prior to publication ofthis Notice of Proposed Rulemaking. Information concerning the consultationis provided in the Background section of this proposed rule. In addition, this proposed rule implements sections 103(e)(3) and 127 ofthe Family Support Act of 1988 by revising regulations to exclude certaincosts from administrative costs when computing incentive payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Consideration will be given to written comments and suggestionsreceived by June 19, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Address comments to: Office of Child Support Enforcement,Department of Health and Human Services, 370 L'Enfant Promenade SW., Washington,DC 20447. Comments will be available for public inspection Monday throughFriday, 8:30 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. in the Department's Office at the aboveaddress.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Joyce Allred, Policy and PlanningDivision, OCSE (202) 252-5369.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>Public reporting burden for the collection of information requirementsat 45 CFR 303.2(a), 303.2(b)(2), 303.2(b)(4), 303.2(b)(5), 303.3 (d) through(g), 303.4(d)(2), 303.6(c)(3), 303.10(b)(6), 303.11(a), 303.11(c), 303.11(d)and 302.32(b) is estimated to average 5, 10, 5, 5, 5, 5, 5, 5, 5, 5, 5,5, 5, 5 and 5 minutes respectively, including the time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data neededand completing and reviewing the collection of information. Send commentsregarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection ofinformation, including suggestions for reducing this burden, to the Officeof Child Support Enforcement, Family Support Administration, 370 L'EnfantPromenade SW., Washington, DC 20447; and to the Office of Information andRegulatory Affairs, Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>Since the inception of the Child Support Enforcement (IV-D) program in1975, States have been required to locate absent parents, establish paternity,obtain support orders and collect support payments. However, in responseto public concern that States were not providing adequate or expeditiousservices under the IV-D program, the Child Support Enforcement Amendmentsof 1984 (1984 Amendments) were enacted into law. The purpose of the 1984Amendments is to strengthen State IV-D programs and improve performance.Among other things, the 1984 Amendments require States to have in effectand use administrative or expedited judicial processes to establish andenforce support orders. Paternity may be established using expedited processesat State option. To implement the new law, OCSE published regulations governingexpedited processes which include timeframes within which actions to establishor enforce support orders must be completed by the court or administrativeauthority. These timeframes require, from the time of filing to the timeof final disposition, 90 percent of actions to be completed in 3 months,98 percent in 6 months and 100 percent in 12 months. The expedited processes timeframes in Federal regulations, however, onlyrefer to the time a case is actually under judicial or administrative review.There are no corresponding overall requirements in Federal regulationsfor expeditious processing of cases from the time of referral from theAid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC) agency, the foster careagency, the State Medicaid agency or application for non-AFDC servicesunder the IV-D program until the IV-D agency takes an appropriate action.There are also few specific requirements regarding what actions are adequateat each step of case processing, what results are expected, and under whatconditions a case may be closed. In April 1987, the U.S. General Accounting Office (GAO) published a reportto the Secretary of Health and Human Services titled <T3>Child Support: Need to Improve Efforts to Identify Fathers and ObtainSupport Orders </T3>(GAO/HRD-87-37) (hereafter referred to as the GAO report)in which it examined State IV-D agency efforts to determine paternity andobtain support orders for AFDC children and the potential impact of the1984 Amendments on the IV-D program. The GAO report stated that State effortsto determine paternity or obtain support orders were inadequate because:(1) AFDC agencies did not refer all cases to IV-D agencies; or (2) IV-Dagencies did not open cases for some referrals, closed some cases prematurely,or did not work open cases for at least six months. Accordingly, GAO recommendedthat OCSE: (1) Require that AFDC agencies refer appropriate cases to theIV-D agencies; (2) require that IV-D agencies open cases and pursue paternityand support orders as required by Federal law and regulations; (3) setperformance standards for establishing paternity and obtaining supportorders; (4) review States' operations to determine whether standards arefollowed; and (5) provide guidance in developing case tracking and monitoringsystems. We agree that stronger Federal leadership is needed to addressthe serious problems cited by GAO and identified as well by OCSE auditsand reviews. The need to eliminate these problems is particularly pressingbecause, as the number of divorces and out-of-wedlock births increase,the number of families needing IV-D services will increase as well. Despite Federal and State efforts in the 13 years since the inception ofthe IV-D program, the child support problem continues to grow. In FY 1987,OCSE conducted IV-D program reviews in most States; since then, activityhas been continuing on a more targeted basis. The purposes of the reviewsare: (1) To focus States' attention on the Federal government's clear objectiveto achieve full implementation of Federal child support legislation andespecially the 1984 Amendments; and (2) to alert States to problems inthe operation of IV-D programs. Results from the program reviews completedto date indicate widespread problems in many aspects of case processingincluding: inadequate cooperation between the AFDC and IV-D agencies withregard to the referral of AFDC cases and information exchange; incompleteor no action taken on cases needing paternity establishment; ineffectiveand incomplete locate procedures; inadequate support obligations established;and ineffective use of enforcement techniques. These findings, coupled with the findings from the FY 1984, 1985 and 1986program results audits (33 of 54 States audited for FY 1984 or 1985 werefound not to be in substantial compliance with IV-D requirements), indicatea compelling need for IV-D programs to improve their performance. To aid in identifying actual case processing steps and the time requiredfor completion of each action required under 45 CFR Part 303, OCSE firstrequested input from State IV-D agencies in the fall of 1987. Various Statessubmitted case processing flow charts and descriptions of case processingsteps from referral of a case by the AFDC agency (referred to generallyas IV-D intake) to establishment and/or enforcement of a child supportobligation. Many case processing schemes submitted were complicated orvague with regard to actual steps taken and the majority of States didnot submit actual timeframes within which actions are taken. However, analysisof this information, and the findings of the program results audits andprogram reviews, underscores the need for more stringent and precise timeframesand program standards.On October 13, 1988, the Family Support Act of 1988 (Pub. L. 100-485) wassigned into law. This new law addresses the injustice of parents failingto assume responsibility for their children's support. Section 121 of Pub.L. 100-485 requires the Secretary of Health and Human Services (HHS) toestablish time limits within which States must accept and respond to requestsfor assistance in establishing and enforcing support orders, includingrequests to locate absent parents, establish paternity and initiate proceedingsto establish and collect support awards. Section 121(b) further required the establishment, no later than December13, 1988, of an advisory committee composed of representatives of organizationsrepresenting Governors, State welfare Administrators and State child supportenforcement Directors. The Secretary is required to consult with the committeeprior to issuing any regulations establishing standards regarding whatconstitutes an adequate response on the part of a State to the requestof an individual, State, or jurisdiction for services. Section 122 of Pub. L. 100-485 requires the Secretary of HHS to establishtime limits governing the period within which a State must distribute amountscollected as child support. While not required by statute, OCSE also consultedwith the advisory committee on these timeframes and made adjustments basedon the advice of the Committee members. We have incorporated the standardsrequired by sections 121 and 122 of P.L. 100-485 into this proposed ruleand plan to issue final regulations no later than August 1, 1989, as specifiedin the law. We believe that the standards which implement sections 121and 122 will significantly improve the performance of IV-D programs. The 19-member advisory committee was appointed in December 1988, and convenedin Washington, DC on January 4, 1989, adjourning the following day. Inaddition to the representation mandated by statute, representatives ofchild advocacy groups, State legislators, judges, prosecuting attorneysand other child support practitioners were included on the advisory committee,enabling us to benefit from the broadest possible range of child supportexpertise in developing these proposed rules. OCSE opened the meeting by providing background information on currentperformance of State IV-D programs and presenting proposed case processingtime standards. The suggested timeframes covered each case processing function,from intake through enforcement. A 2-day discussion of prompt responseand distribution issues followed. Committee members presented their viewson the appropriateness of each of the timeframes and processing steps developedby OCSE and recommended alternatives where they considered the initialproposal to be overly extensive or unduly restrictive. The committee alsosuggested additional processing steps that based on their experience warrantedinclusion under the timeframes. As a result, many of the timeframes andcase processing steps provided herein have been revised from those originallycontemplated by OCSE. The committee generally agreed that current child support case processingis in need of major improvement and that proposed timeframes should reflectrealistic expectations of improved services rather than limited standardswhich can be readily met with minimal effort. In particular, the committeewas concerned that the time standards initially considered by OCSE in theareas of distribution, case opening, support order establishment and serviceof process were not stringent enough. In addition, the committee identifiedand provided a number of recommendations for closing potential loopholesin the case processing scheme under consideration. As a result, many ofthe case processing timeframes, as well as a number of the case processingsteps proposed herein are a direct result of the advisory committee's recommendations.A distinct minority of committee members argued that time standards shouldnot be phased in until, in accordance with Pub. L. 100-485, automated childsupport information management systems are mandatory in 1995. However,we disagree that the timeframes proposed herein cannot be met much sooner.In fact, a number of committee members indicated their IV-D programs couldcurrently meet many of the proposed timeframes. Many spoke of the thirteenyears that have already elapsed since the basic framework and requirementsof the IV-D program were enacted into law. Further, in mandating that wepublish final rules setting timeframes for case processing within 10 monthsof enactment of Pub. L. 100-485, Congress surely did not intend for usto allow States six or seven more years to meet those timeframes. We believethat these proposed timeframes are well-reasoned, having been developedbased on the experience of many child support experts representing differentpoints of view and that meeting the timeframes should be within the graspof any well-managed IV-D agency by October of 1990. Further, over time, we intend to reconsider the time standards to determineif they are stringent enough to ensure services are being provided promptlygiven operational experience and steadily expanding automation of programactivities since their adoption. We solicit comment on what steps we shouldtake to reflect improvements in case processing over time. One option isto wait to decide whether and how to change time frames in the programstandards. Another option is to write into the final regulation a dateby which these regulations must be reviewed and updated. A third optionwould be to write into the regulation shorter time frames for years after1990. We would appreciate comments on these options, and other suggestionsthat commenters may wish to offer.With the exception of a minority viewpoint over when time standards shouldbe phased in, the committee generally reached consensus on each of thespecific timeframes and case processing steps contained in this rule. Theproposals in this rule were greatly influenced and often suggested by thoseon the advisory committee. The committee's valuable contribution to thiseffort and support for the contents of this proposal and what these standardsare intended to accomplish are greatly appreciated. Therefore, we propose to strengthen the current requirements and definestandards for program operations, in accordance with Pub. L. 100-485, asfollows. Current regulations governing case processing contain requirementsto process cases ``promptly'', ``as soon as possible'', etc. Vague regulatoryrequirements invite differing interpretations and inhibit accountability.In addition, existing specific timeframes intended to be the maximum timenecessary or allowable to take an action often become the minimum amountof time within which any action is initiated. Based on the analysis of program audit and program review results, inputfrom State IV-D agencies, early discussions with experts in child supportenforcement case processing and program operations and recommendationsof the advisory committee, we developed standards set forth in this proposedregulation which should ensure appropriate and expeditious processing ofIV-D cases. States would have to meet the standards for case processingcontained in this proposed rule as one facet of the determination of whetherthey are in substantial compliance with the requirements of title IV-Dof the Act. We believe the proposed standards are realistic and focusedin areas where increased effectiveness and efficiency are necessary foran enhanced IV-D program. We intend to revise the regulations governing audits of State child supportenforcement programs to address substantial compliance with the proposedcase processing timeframes and program standards. We will issue a proposedaudit regulation soon after publication of these program standards regulationsas final rules. As a general rule, States would be required to meet thecase processing timeframes and standards in 75 percent of the cases reviewedfor an audit as one facet of the determination of whether they are in substantialcompliance with the requirements of title IV-D of the Act beginning October1, 1990. We recognize that there may be a small percentage of cases which will notbe processed in accordance with required timeframes because of the specificcircumstances of the case. However, we believe that the number of suchcases is so minute as to have little impact, even in a marginally effectiveprogram, on the substantial compliance standard, which requires that only75 percent of cases meet the required timeframes to successfully pass theaudit. The advisory committee supported this position. Requirements for timely IV-D program operations are only one part of theIV-D amendments contained in Pub. L. 100-485. However, because of stringentstatutory deadlines, this proposed rule addresses time limits for acceptingand responding to requests for establishment and enforcement of supportorders and the distribution of support collections. This proposed rulewould also revise regulations to exclude from State administrative costsin computing incentive payments, the costs of: (1) State demonstrationprojects for evaluating model procedures for reviewing child support awards,as authorized by section 103(e)(3) of Pub. L. 100-485; and (2) effectiveJanuary 1, 1990, the costs of interstate enforcement demonstrations inaccordance with section 458(d) of the Act, as amended by section 127 ofPub. L. 100-485. The remaining child support provisions of Pub. L. 100-485 which requireregulations by OCSE will be implemented in separate regulations. Theseseparate regulations will address requirements for immediate income withholding(section 101); disregard applicable to timely child support payments (section102); State guidelines for child support award amounts, including reviewand modification of orders (section 103, with the exception of section103(e), regulated in this document); timing of notice of support paymentcollections (section 104); performance standards for State paternity establishmentprograms, including mandatory genetic testing in contested paternity cases(section 111); increased Federal assistance for paternity establishment(section 112); and mandatory automated tracking and monitoring systems(section 123). The following charts summarize many of the time standards in this proposedregulation. They also incorporate interactions with other regulations,such as those for wage withholding and expedited processes. These chartsshould make it easier for the public to review this notice of proposedrulemaking.<ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4150-04-M 003</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="42">Insert illustration(s) 2 417-419</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4150-04-C  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Statutory Authority </ITAG>This regulation is proposed under the authority of sections 452 (a)(1)and (a)(2), (h) and (i), 454(13), 458(d) and 1102 of the Act. Sections 452(a) (1) and (2) require the Secretary to establish such standardsfor State programs for locating absent parents, establishing paternity,and obtaining child support as he determines to be necessary to assurethat such programs will be effective, and to establish minimal organizationaland staffing requirements for State units engaged in carrying out suchprograms. Section 452(h) of the Act, added by section 121 of Pub. L. 100-485,requires the Secretary to establish time limits governing the period orperiods within which a State must accept and respond to requests for assistancein establishing and enforcing support orders, including requests to locateabsent parents, establish paternity, and initiate proceedings to establishand collect child support awards. Section 452(i) of the Act, added by section122 of Pub. L. 100-485, requires the Secretary to establish time limitsgoverning the period or periods within which a State must distribute amountscollected as child support. Section 454(13) of the Act requires Statesto comply with such requirements and standards as the Secretary of HHSdetermines to be necessary for the establishment of an effective IV-D program.Section 458(d) of the Act, as amended by section 127 of Pub. L. 100-485,requires States to exclude for purposes of computing incentives, the amountsexpended by the State in carrying out a special project assisted undersection 455(e) of the Act. Section 1102 of the Act requires the Secretaryto publish regulations that may be necessary for the efficient administrationof the functions for which he is responsible under the Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Provisions </ITAG>This proposed regulation would prescribe standards for program operationswhich the IV-D agency must meet, including minimal organizational and staffingrequirements, and requirements governing: maintenance of case records;location of absent parents; establishment of support obligations; establishmentof paternity; service of process; enforcement of support obligations; conditionsunder which cases may be closed; distribution of support payments; andincentive payments. In addition, this regulation would make technical changesand add new sections for clarity and consistency with the above-mentionedchanges to Parts 302 and 303. States would be required to meet these standardsby October 1, 1990. Changes with respect to excluding costs of interstate grants when computingincentives would be effective January 1, 1990, and changes with respectto excluding costs of demonstration projects on model procedures for reviewingchild support awards would be effective when the costs are incurred. Support Payments to the IV-D Agency_Section 302.32 Under current regulations, the lack of, or outdated, timeframes for takingaction cause excessive delays in accounting for and distributing supportcollections. These delays penalize the obligor and the children. Becausethe intent of the IV-D program is to help families attain self-sufficiencyby ensuring that children receive the financial support to which they areentitled, timeframes for the distribution of support payments are necessary.The timeframes in this proposed rule would ensure the timely distributionof collections after receipt by the IV-D agency to families in need ofthem. We propose to revise andSection; 302.32, Support payments to the IV-Dagency, to reduce the time within which IV-D agencies must report collectionsto IV-A agencies and to add specific timeframes for distribution of collectionsin both AFDC and non-AFDC cases as a first step in ensuring that childsupport collections reach the intended recipients as expeditiously as possible.We will continue to review and, as necessary, tighten distribution timeframesto parallel improvements in areas affecting distribution of collectionsreceived. For example, the requirements of the Expedited Funds AvailabilityAct, Title IV of Pub. L 100-86, enacted August 10, 1987 and initially effectiveSeptember 1, 1988, seeks to ensure prompt availability of funds and toexpedite clearance of most checks. Beyond directly facilitating State distributionof child support collections, the statutory timeframes required of financialinstitutions can also serve as a guidepost against which to measure performanceand set goals for the distribution aspect of the IV-D program. Section 302.32(b)_Informing the IV-A Agency of Collections Expeditious redetermination of eligibility is an important step in achievingthe IV-D goal of helping families attain self-sufficiency. The IV-A agencymust be informed of the amount of a collection so that eligibility canbe redetermined and the support collection can be distributed properlyand in a timely manner. Current regulations at andSection; 302.32(b) requirethe IV-D agency to inform the IV-A agency of the amount of collection whichrepresents payment on the required support obligation for that month assoon as possible but not later than 30 days after the end of a month. Thismeans that a collection on January 2 need not be reported until February28_57 days later. We believe that this timeframe is excessive and thatStates should have the capability to report collections in a more timelymanner. Accordingly, we propose to amend paragraph (b) to require thatthe IV-D agency inform the State's IV-A agency of the amount of the collectionwhich represents payment on the required support obligation for that monthwithin 10 working days from the date of receipt by the IV-D agency responsiblefor final distribution of the collection. Section 302.32(f)_Timeframes for Distribution of Amounts Collected We propose to add a new paragraph andSection; 302.32(f) to mandate timeframesfor distribution of support payments.Each distribution timeframe proposed under this paragraph requires thatcollections must be distributed within a certain number of days from thedate of initial receipt within the State. This means that States must distributecollections within, for example, 15 working days from the date the collectionis first received in the State. If the collection must pass through morethan one entity in the State before reaching the final distribution point,the State must still ensure that the collection is distributed within 15working days of the date of <T3>first</T3> receipt in the State. In wage withholding cases, the timeframewould start when the withheld amount is received in the State, not whenit is withheld by the employer. Proposed distribution timeframes were discussed a great deal in the advisorycommittee meeting. The initial proposal presented to the group recommendedallowing each entity in a State through which a collection passed (e.g.,court, local IV-D agency, State IV-D agency) 10 working days to forwardthe collection. Almost universally, the committee members felt that theinitial OCSE proposal was an unduly protracted timeframe. Committee memberswere negative to an approach which would allow each entity within a Stateto hold a collection for a period of time to the disadvantage of the children.The clear consensus was that an all-encompassing timeframe from initialreceipt within the State until payment to the custodial parent and childrenshould be set. It then would be up to the designated single State agencyto monitor performance and limit delays at each step of the process. Committeemembers generally agreed that as short a time as feasible should be set,making allowance for interstate case situations. Virginia has been undercourt order for over a year to distribute child support collections within15 days, and has almost always met that condition without difficulty throughmanagement commitment and an appropriate allocation of resources to thetask. Therefore, we have responded to the committee's concern that distributionbe as timely as possible for the benefit of the children who, all too frequently,are in desperate financial circumstances, while allowing adequate timefor more difficult situations such as interstate cases, as the basis forthe timeframes discussed below. 1. Section 302.32(f)(1)_Timeframes for Distribution of Amounts Collectedin Interstate IV-D Cases Current regulations under andSection; 303.7(c)(7)(iv) require in interstateIV-D cases, the responding State to collect and monitor any support paymentsfrom the absent parent and forward payments to the location specified bythe initiating IV-D agency no later than 10 days after the collection isreceived, except with respect to certain Federal tax offset collections.We propose to add a new paragraph andSection; 302.32(f)(1) to require ininterstate IV-D cases, amounts collected by the responding State on behalfof the initiating State to be forwarded to the initiating State within10 working days of the initial point of receipt in the responding Statein accordance with andSection; 303.7(c)(7)(iv). This does not reflect a changein policy but simply conforms this proposed requirement to the currentrequirement under the interstate regulation. 2. Section 302.32(f)(2)_Timeframes for Distribution of Amounts Collectedon Behalf of Current Recipients or AFDC and Title IV-E Foster Care AssistanceWe propose to add a new andSection; 302.32(f)(2) to require States to meetspecific timeframes in distributing collections on behalf of current recipientsof AFDC and title IV-E foster care assistance. Current regulations at andSection; 302.51(b)(1) require that, of any amountthat is collected as support by the IV-D agency on behalf of current recipientsof aid under the State's IV-A plan and for whom an assignment under andSection;232.11 is effective, the first $50 of any amount collected in a month whichrepresents payment of the required support obligation for that month shallbe paid to the family. Because the $50 pass-through must be disregardedin redetermining eligibility, there is no reason to delay sending thatamount to the family. Accordingly, we propose to amend andSection; 302.32by adding a new paragraph (f)(2)(i) to require that payments to the familyin AFDC cases under andSection; 302.51(b)(1) must be made within 15 workingdays of the date of initial receipt in the State. Therefore, the 15-daytimeframe would start when the collection is received by the first pointof receipt within the State. This required timeframe would apply regardlessof whether the IV-A agency distributes the $50 disregard or the IV-D agencymakes the $50 disregard payment under agreement with the IV-A agency. We propose to amend andSection; 302.32 further to address the distributionof collections in AFDC cases under andSection; 302.51(b) (2) through (5).Because the amounts collected in excess of the $50 payment to the familyare, for the most part, used to reimburse the State and Federal governmentfor AFDC payments to the family, we propose to require in paragraph (f)(2)(ii)that, except as specified under proposed paragraph (f)(2)(iv), collectionsunder andSection; 302.51(b) (2) through (5) must be distributed within 15working days of notice of eligibility redetermination by the IV-A agency.However, we would allow States to distribute such collections prior toeligibility redetermination at the IV-D agency's discretion. We are proposingto allow States to distribute collections under andSection; 302.51(b) (2)through (5) without waiting for eligibility redetermination because, whileredetermination of eligibility can take up to four months, a collectionwhich causes ineligibility is used to reimburse the State and Federal governmentfor AFDC paid to the family in the month of collection. Although some subsequentadjustment may be necessary, the benefits of timely distribution warrantallowing States this flexibility.We propose to require in paragraph (f)(2)(iii) that, except as specifiedin paragraph (f)(2)(iv), collections in title IV-E foster care cases mustbe distributed within 15 working days of the date of initial receipt inthe State.Finally, proposed paragraph (f)(2)(iv) requires collections as a resultof Federal or State tax refund offset to be distributed in AFDC cases underandSection; 302.51(b) (4) and (5) and in title IV-E foster care cases underandSection; 302.52(b) (3) and (4) within 15 working days of the date of initialreceipt in the State. Even though tax offset collections are batched ina discrete timeframe, for the most part, unlike regularly recurring collections,we believe that distribution can be handled expeditiously, albeit perhapswith some shifting of IV-D agency resources. Therefore, we are proposingthe same 15 working day timeframe with respect to these collections aswell.3. Section 302.32(f)(3)_Timeframes for Distribution of Amounts Collectedon Behalf of Non-AFDC IndividualsTo ensure timely distribution of amounts collected on behalf of individualsreceiving services under andSection; 302.33, we propose to require in andSection;302.32(f)(3) timeframes within which States must distribute collectionson behalf of non-AFDC families. Current delays in some States in transmittingsupport payments to the family are excessive and unwarranted. We believethat these timeframes are necessary to ensure that children receive thesupport to which they are entitled in a timely manner.Under andSection; 302.32(f)(3)(i), we propose that amounts collected whichrepresent payment on the current support obligation shall be paid to thefamily within 15 working days of the date of initial receipt in the State.New paragraph (f)(3)(ii) would reflect current policy by requiring that,except as specified in paragraph (f)(3)(iii), if the amount collected ismore than the amount required to be distributed in paragraph (f)(3)(i)discussed above, the State may, at its discretion, either pay such amountsto the family to satisfy non-AFDC past-due support or retain such amountsas have been assigned to satisfy past assistance paid to the family whichhas not been reimbursed. In States where the IV-D agency opts to applysuch amounts to non-AFDC arrearages, the amounts must be paid to the familywithin 15 working days of the date of initial receipt in the State. New paragraph (f)(3)(iii) would address timeframes for distribution ofFederal income tax refund offset collections in non-AFDC cases. Amountscollected as a result of tax refund offset to satisfy past-due supportwould be distributed under andSection; 302.51(b) (4) and (5) within 15 workingdays of the date of initial receipt in the State, with one exception. Section303.72(h)(5) allows States, in cases where the Secretary of the Treasury,through OCSE, notifies the State that an offset is being made to satisfynon-AFDC past due support from a Federal refund based on a joint return,to delay distribution until notified that the unobligated spouse's propershare of the refund has been paid or for a period not to exceed six monthsfrom notification of offset, whichever is earlier.Since timeframes for distribution of all IV-D collections, regardless ofthe collection mechanism (e.g., Federal or State income tax refund offset,wage withholding), would be governed by proposed andSection; 302.32(f), referenceto timeliness of distribution in other regulations is unnecessary. Accordingly,we propose to amend andSection; 302.51 by deleting in paragraph (a) the lastsentence that reads ``In any case in which collections are received byan entity other than the agency responsible for final distribution underthis section, the entity must transmit the collections within 10 days ofreceipt.'' and by deleting in paragraphs (b) (3) and (5) the sentence thatreads ``This payment shall be made in the month following the month inwhich the amount of the collection was used to redetermine eligibilityfor an assistance payment under the State's title IV-A plan''. Similarly,we propose to amend andSection; 303.100(e)(2) to delete reference to distributing``promptly'' amounts collected through wage or income withholding. Finally,we would delete from regulations governing distribution of State tax refundoffset collections the words ``Within a reasonable time period in accordancewith State law'' in andSection; 303.102(g)(1).Maintenance of Case Records_Section 303.2Current andSection; 303.2 requires the IV-D agency, for all cases referredto the IV-D agency or upon application for IV-D services under andSection;302.33, to immediately establish a case record. The case record must containall information collected pertaining to the case. Furthermore, currentregulations list information which should be included, when applicable,at andSection; 303.2 (a) through (l).Despite these current requirements, GAO reported that seven of the eightIV-D agencies visited in the study cited earlier did not open cases andestablish records for 110 of the 760 children who needed orders and didnot get them. GAO stressed that failure to open cases results in some childrenbeing denied paternity determinations and support orders and distorts statisticsneeded by program managers and the Congress to accurately measure performanceand identify problems that may require corrective legislative actions.Similar findings are evident in IV-D program audit results. Of 33 Statesfound not to comply substantially with title IV-D requirements as a resultof an audit for FY 1984 and 1985, nine States have been assessed a penaltyfor failure to meet the requirement for maintenance of case records becausecase records could not be located or because case documentation was inadequate.This indicates that cases had never been opened or case records had beenlost.Case opening problems are compounded by the fact that there are no formalrequirements governing the IV-D application process. As a result, thereare reportedly long delays in even accepting an application in some States.Members of the advisory committee discussed the overwhelming need for specificrequirements setting timeframes within which States must accept and respondto applications for IV-D services. The initial proposal we presented tothe group required that States open a case within 2 working days of receiptof referral or application. The members of the group expressed concernabout problems individuals have in obtaining and filing IV-D applications.The consensus of the group was to retain our proposed 2-day timeframe forcase opening and to add formal requirements governing the accessibility,availability and filing of applications for services. The group believesthat this is necessary to ensure that the case opening requirements aretriggered promptly. The intent of the Child Support Enforcement program is to ensure that IV-Dservices are provided to those cases which require them. Unless applicationsare provided and accepted and cases are opened, this purpose cannot beachieved. In response to advisory committee input, the problems reportedby GAO and OCSE's program reviews and program audits, we believe it isnecessary to clearly state what actions IV-D agencies must take to provideand accept applications for IV-D services and to open a case upon referralor application for IV-D services. Accordingly, this proposed regulation would revise andSection; 303.2 in severalways. First, the section title, Maintenance of case records, would be changedto Establishment of cases and maintenance of case records. Because thisproposed regulation would expand and clarify the requirements for caseestablishment, to be discussed below, it should be reflected in the title.Second, current andSection; 303.2(a) through (1) are examples of the typeof information to be included in case records. The list, while not all-inclusive,is lengthy. We do not believe it is necessary to attempt to spell out allthe information that should be included in a case record. Rather, we areproposing to address IV-D agency responsibilities with regard to the applicationprocess in andSection; 303.2(a) and to address case records in proposed andSection;303.2(b). <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Application Process </ITAG>The requirements for provision of non-AFDC services do not apply untilthe IV-D agency receives an application for IV-D services. However, becausethere are no current requirements governing when the IV-D agency must provideand accept the applications, there are indefensible delays in the establishmentof case records and provision of services. In accordance with Pub. L. 100-485,we are proposing to set forth explicit requirements and timeframes forresponding to requests from individuals for child support assistance. Thiswill ensure that individuals receive applications for IV-D services andthat once applications are received, cases are opened and services providedin a timely manner. Current regulations at andSection; 302.30 require that IV-D agencies mustpublicize the availability of support enforcement services and must includea telephone number or address where further information may be obtained.However, further information is often not readily available to individuals.Often, individuals cannot receive applications for services or informationabout IV-D services until an intake appointment is scheduled. Members ofthe advisory committee reported that current State practices regardingapplications frustrate individuals who are trying to obtain IV-D services.For instance, they indicated that at least seven States require an intakeappointment to receive or fill out an application and often appointmentsare not available for at least 6 to 8 weeks. In addition, when individualscall to request services, an application may never be mailed to them. Thesedelays are discouraging to the individual and antithetical to the purposeof the IV-D program. To ensure that IV-D services are provided to thosepersons who require them, it is crucial that individuals have access toIV-D applications without having to wait unreasonable periods of time.Accordingly, proposed paragraph (a)(1) would require that the IV-D agencymust make applications for child support services readily accessible tothe public. To ensure that applications are provided as soon as possible after an individualinquires about IV-D services, we propose to require in andSection; 303.2(a)(2)that the IV-D agency must provide applications on the day an individualrequests an application or services. In addition, information describingavailable services, the individual's rights and responsibilities and theState's fees, cost recovery and distribution policies must accompany allapplications for services. While the above requirements should ensure that IV-D information is providedto individuals in a timely manner, cases cannot be opened and servicescannot be provided until the application is received and a case recordis established. Case record establishment, to be discussed in more detailbelow, is the essential first step in gathering the information neededto process cases effectively. Because in non-AFDC cases this informationis initially gathered on the application, States must log in and assessthe application in a timely manner. However, because only minimal informationis needed to establish a case record, we propose to require in paragraph(a)(3) that the IV-D agency must accept an application as filed on theday it is received. An application is a written document provided by theState which indicates that the individual is seeking assistance with achild support problem and is signed by the individual applying for IV-Dservices. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Opening Cases </ITAG>We are proposing in andSection; 303.2(b) that, for all cases referred tothe IV-D agency or applying for IV-D services under andSection; 302.33, theIV-D agency must open a case within two working days of receipt of referralor application for services by establishing a case record. The case record(which may be automated, on paper or a combination thereof) must be supplementedwith all information and documents pertaining to the case and will includeall relevant facts, dates, actions taken, contacts made and results ina case.Initially, a case file will contain only that information which is availableupon application or referral. The additional information and documentspertaining to the case described above would be included in the case fileas they become available or as they are gathered. Therefore, because theinitial requirements for case opening are minimal, we believe two workingdays for opening cases is adequate and reasonable. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Actions Required Within 15 Working Days of Referral or Applicationfor IV-D Services </ITAG>With regard to cases referred to the IV-D agency, the AFDC agency is requiredunder 45 CFR 235.70 to provide all relevant information prescribed by theIV-D agency. Often, however, the interview to determine AFDC eligibilityis inadequate to gather the information. Because of the need for increased cooperation and coordination betweenthe AFDC (IV-A) and IV-D programs, the Family Support Administration (FSA)launched the IV-A/IV-D Interface Initiative in FY 1986 to improve the interactionbetween IV-A and IV-D programs. As mentioned previously, IV-D program reviewshighlighted serious problems which prevent effective IV-A/IV-D agency interactionincluding: Lack of timeliness in reporting; inadequate information referred;and poor understanding of the roles of each agency. As part of the Initiative,OCSE is working with the Office of Family Assistance (OFA) to correct theseproblems. To date, the following goals have been accomplished: 1. FSA has funded four demonstration projects under which States will testthe following techniques: a separate AFDC applicant interview by a childsupport enforcement worker and initiation of IV-D services within the AFDCapplication period; the invoking of sanctions by the IV-D agency for failureto cooperate in establishing paternity and obtaining a support order; andenhanced data exchange between the two programs. 2. Each FSA Regional Office initially conducted an interface program reviewof at least one locality and issued a report including recommendationsfor improvement. Regional Offices have carried out subsequent activitiesin this same vein. 3. Several States have initiated or are developing pilot projects to testthe feasibility of innovative provisions to address problems such as: latecase referrals from IV-A to IV-D agencies and insufficient, or poor quality,information referred; poor exchange of case status information; lack ofcommunication between IV-A and IV-D agencies; and inadequate staff training.4. OCSE developed training packages to improve understanding of each agency'sroles and programs and to strengthen the training and orientation of workerswithin and between programs. The National Institute of Child Support Enforcement(NICSE), under contract to OCSE, developed and field tested the Participants'Handbook and Trainers' Guide Handbook with local jurisdictions and conductedthe first two sessions for training certified trainers in February, 1988.5. OCSE is identifying State and local practices that are innovative andwill improve the interface process. Three ``best practices'' have alreadybeen publicized on failure to cooperate, direct referrals and automateddata exchange. The problems discussed above must be solved because the information obtainedfrom the AFDC client is critical to the establishment and processing ofa IV-D case. While State AFDC agencies should gather all pertinent andnecessary information at the AFDC interview, the IV-D agency may need togather additional information. Some States conduct IV-D interviews beforeAFDC eligibility is determined. This practice, which is accomplished withinthe permissible time period for AFDC eligibility determination, often producesquality child support-related information quickly. We would like to pointout that Federal funding is available for this IV-D activity regardlessof whether the applicant is determined to be eligible for AFDC. If thecustodial parent is determined to be ineligible for AFDC, States shouldencourage the applicant to apply for non-AFDC IV-D services in order toobtain support for the child. Federal AFDC regulations have requirements for prompt referral of casesto child support agencies, but this NPRM does not include any correspondingrequirements for child support agencies to make sure they receive the referrals.We specifically request comment on the possibility of requiring State IV-Dagencies to have agreements in place to ensure that all cases are referredwithin a specified number of working days of an application or determinationof eligibility for AFDC, Foster Care or Medicaid benefits. Proposed andSection; 303.2(c) would require the IV-D agency to take specificactions on a case within 15 working days of receipt of referral of a caseby the AFDC, IV-E (foster care) or Medicaid agency or of an applicationunder andSection; 302.33. GAO specifically recommended in their report thatOCSE take steps to improve State efforts to determine paternity and establishsupport orders. We agree that it is necessary to take steps to ensure thatIV-D agencies immediately open cases and pursue paternity and support ordersbecause we believe the initial steps taken in child support enforcementare crucial. Often it is at the first point of contact with the custodialparent that information is most likely to be available and accurate, particularlywith regard to location leads, paternity issues, etc. We believe that atimeframe of 15 working days is both reasonable and necessary to ensurethat cases are forwarded for necessary action expeditiously. We want tostress, however, that the 15-day requirement is intended as an outer limit.If at any point prior to the end of the required time limit there is sufficientinformation to proceed, the State must initiate the next appropriate actionon a case within 2 working days of determination of that action, as requiredin proposed paragraph (c)(3). Child support cases enter the IV-D system at different stages of readinessand success in each case is contingent upon timely determination of whatappropriate action is necessary. Furthermore, regardless of what or howmuch information is initially received on a case, the information is onlyas useful as it is accurate and complete. As stated previously, althoughthe AFDC agency is required to gather all relevant information on a case,additional information may be necessary. The GAO report identified casesin the study which were closed due to what the State termed ``inadequateinformation'' about the alleged father. Although the particular State identifiedhad written procedures requiring interviews to attempt to obtain informationabout the absent parent, records were not adequate to determine whetherany information gathering had taken place.The initial proposal we presented to the advisory committee required thatwithin 15 working days of receipt of referral or application, the IV-Dagency must conduct an interview if necessary. The group urged us to deletethis requirement because an interview may not be needed in each instanceat this point in case processing. Furthermore, they did not agree withsetting a standard based on an ``if necessary'' judgment call. Althoughwe have not required an interview, States must obtain as much informationas possible from the custodial parent. This information is the most valuablein preparing a case for necessary service. To ensure all efforts to gatheraccurate information are made, we propose to require in paragraph (c)(1)that, within 15 working days of receipt of a case or of an applicationfor services, based on an assessment of the case to determine necessaryaction, the IV-D agency must solicit necessary information from the custodialparent and other relevant sources and initiate verification of information.Many cases enter the IV-D system with inaccurate, incomplete, outdatedor no location information. Every attempt must be made to locate the absentparent because, without this information, establishment of paternity orestablishment and enforcement of child support obligations is impossible.Therefore, we propose, in paragraph (c)(2), that the IV-D agency must,as necessary, access all appropriate State and local automated locationsources within the 15-day timeframe. State and local automated locationsources would include any of those location sources listed in andSection;303.3 which are automated. The State parent locator service (PLS) shouldhave access to all these records. This requirement would ensure that everyeffort is made to gather information necessary to proceed with a case.Within the 15-day timeframe, under paragraph (c)(3), if there is adequatelocation information available to proceed with a case, the IV-D agencymust initiate necessary action on the case within 2 working days of determinationof the next appropriate action or service. Such actions could include referralto another State for necessary services if the absent parent has been locatedin another State. Alternatively, in situations where there is inadequatelocation information to proceed with a case, paragraph (c)(4) would requirethe IV-D agency to refer the case for further location attempts as specifiedin andSection; 303.3. As stated previously, the proposed 15-day timeframe is intended as an outerlimit. If at any point prior to the end of the 15 working days there issufficient information to proceed with the case, the State must determinethe next appropriate action or service immediately. The requirements governing case opening and maintenance of case recordswill ensure that all appropriate cases enter the IV-D system and receiveprompt attention. While the proposed rule requires the IV-D agency to performthe above-mentioned actions within the prescribed timeframes, we wouldlike to stress that, in cases referred to IV-D agencies, the extent towhich certain of these actions are necessary or appropriate depends forthe most part on the amount and accuracy of information gathered on a caseby the referring agency and the steps taken on a case by that agency priorto referral. By requiring the IV-D agency to perform these functions tothe extent that they have not been performed by others, we do not intendto remove the burden and responsibility on the referring agency of forwardingas complete and accurate case information as possible. Often the most recentand accurate information can be obtained from the custodial parent duringthe interview for AFDC eligibility. The interview and the AFDC eligibilityworker's initial efforts to ascertain as much information as possible areessential steps toward the goal of providing necessary services successfully.Finally, we would like to point out that in situations where the custodialparent fails to cooperate, the IV-D agency should notify the AFDC or fostercare agency of noncooperation but should not suspend activities to establishpaternity or secure support in any case unless, as provided under andSection;302.31(b), the IV-D agency receives notice from the AFDC or IV-E agencythat there has been a claim of good cause for failing to cooperate. Inaccordance with andSection; 302.31(c), the IV-D agency will not undertaketo establish paternity or secure support in any case for which it has receivednotice from the IV-A or IV-E agency that there has been a finding of goodcause pursuant to andSection;andSection; 232.40 through 232.49 of this titleunless there has been a determination by the State or local IV-A or IV-Eagency that support enforcement may proceed without the participation ofthe caretaker or other relative. If there has been such a determination,the IV-D agency will undertake to establish paternity or secure supportbut may not involve the caretaker or other relative in such undertaking.Location of Absent Parents_Section 303.3 Current regulations at 45 CFR 303.3 set forth requirements for all casesreferred to the IV-D agency or applying for services under andSection; 302.33under which State IV-D agencies must attempt to locate all absent parentswhen their location is unknown. Because current and accurate location information is a prerequisite toany action to establish or enforce a child support obligation, we believeimprovements in the requirements regarding location are necessary. Themembers of the advisory committee agreed with our proposed improvementsto this section but discussed at great length the need to formally define``location'' and to close loopholes in the location process. The proposedrequirements and timeframes herein, and the new section governing serviceof process, are a direct result of the advisory committee's discussionsabout the importance of improved location services. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Definition </ITAG>The advisory committee stressed that the location function can only beconsidered complete or successful when the address received is accurate.Accordingly, we propose to define in andSection; 303.3(a) ``location'' asthe confirmed physical whereabouts of the absent parent or his or her employer(s),other sources of income, and/or assets. We want to point out that the needfor confirmation of the location information would depend on whether theinformation received is current (e.g., confirmation may not be necessaryif address information received through accessing the Department of MotorVehicles shows that the absent parent provided the address recently).<ITAG tagnum="81">2. </ITAG>Location Sources Current andSection; 303.3(c) requires the IV-D agency to use appropriateState agencies and departments, which at a minimum must include those departmentswhich maintain records of public assistance, unemployment insurance, incometaxation, driver's licenses, vehicle registration and criminal records.We propose to redesignate paragraph (c) as (b)(3) and add departments whichmaintain records of employment and wage records to the list. Employmentfiles are a particularly valuable location source because they are updatedquarterly and often contain the most recent address information. This proposedchange, together with the current requirements at andSection; 303.3(a) and(b) (redesignated in this proposed rule as (b)(1) and (2)) for use of locallocation sources, should ensure that all available and appropriate sourcesare used to locate an absent parent. This NPRM does not include any requirements on the use of private automateddata sources. We specifically request comment on the possibility of includingrequirements or encouragement on the use of credit reporting agencies andthe Postal Service contractor's recent mover data base. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. </ITAG>Actions Required Within 30 Working Days Current regulations at andSection; 303.3(d) require the IV-D agency to utilizeall appropriate State and local location sources within 60 days of referralof the case from the AFDC agency or application under andSection; 302.33.Despite this 60-day timeframe for accessing State and local sources, theGAO report identified cases in their study which were closed due to whatthe State termed ``inadequate information'' about the alleged father. Inaddition, 20 of 43 States assessed penalties as a result of FY 1984, 1985and 1986 program audits failed to comply substantially with program requirementsfor providing location services. Currently, the States and localities decidewhat location attempts are adequate and when a case can be closed. As theaudit results and the GAO report indicate, IV-D agency efforts to locateabsent parents are often inadequate. We propose to redesignate current andSection; 303.3(d) as (b)(4) and reviseit to require that the IV-D agency, within 30 working days of referralof the case, application under andSection; 302.33, or determination thatlocation of the absent parent is unknown, access all appropriate locationsources. Inadequate location efforts are difficult to understand given the greatstrides States have made developing automated child support systems. Useof automated systems significantly reduces the time it takes to accesslocation sources. Given today's automated access to many location sources,and the fact that the 60-day timeframe was set in 1978, prior to this automatedaccess, we propose to reduce the time within which the IV-D agency mustaccess all appropriate location sources to 30 working days in paragraph(b)(4). We want to stress that child support case processing is a dynamic process.There may be many points in case processing where the IV-D agency cannotproceed because the absent parent moves or changes jobs or where the caseotherwise necessitates further location efforts. The advisory committeewas particularly concerned with the fact that current regulations put theemphasis on front-end location efforts but do not explicitly take intoconsideration situations where location services are necessary at a laterpoint in case processing because, for example, the absent parent's location,although it may have been previously known, becomes unknown. To close thisloophole, we propose to require in paragraph (b)(4) that these locationrequirements would again apply at any point where the State determinesthat location services are warranted (i.e., at any point in case processingwhere location is needed, the required location sources must be accessedwithin 30 working days of request for location as a result of determiningthat the location of the absent parent, employer, other source of incomeand/or assets is unknown). We believe 30 working days is reasonable givenmany States' capabilities for immediate or very rapid access to motor vehicle,employment security and other records. Nevertheless, we encourage commentson this timeframe. We are proposing a parallel change to andSection; 303.7(c)(4) which currentlyrequires responding IV-D agencies, in interstate cases, to provide locationservices in accordance with andSection; 303.3 within 60 days of receipt ofan Interstate Child Support Transmittal Form, a URESA Action Request Formspackage or other alternative State form and documentation from its interstatecentral registry. We propose to change the 60-day timeframe to 30 workingdays to be consistent with the 30 working day timeframe proposed in andSection;303.3(b)(4). Paragraph (b)(5) would require that the IV-D agency transmit appropriatecases to the Federal PLS, including cases which qualify for submittal tothe FPLS and for which State and local location efforts have been unsuccessful.While the Federal PLS is a valuable source, we want to avoid situationswhere cases are ``shot-gunned'' to the FPLS when State and local sourcescould provide accurate location information. We urge States to examineeach case to decide which location sources would be the most appropriate.The 1984 Amendments amended section 453(f) of the Act to permit Statesto access the Federal PLS without first exhausting State PLS resourcesand States may now submit appropriate cases to the Federal and State PLSsimultaneously without waiting to access local location sources. Exceptwhen States have reason to believe an absent parent/putative father livesor has assets out of State, we encourage States to use automated data sourcesbefore requesting Federal PLS services. We want to point out, however,that in interstate cases, the Federal PLS is accessed by the initiatingState. The responding State is not required to access the Federal PLS againupon receipt of the case. We also propose in paragraph (b)(6) that within 2 working days of location,the IV-D agency must initiate necessary action or service (i.e., establishmentof paternity or a support order or enforcement of a support order). Thisrequirement again is indicative of the advisory committee's concern thatcases move forward as soon as one action is completed and the next appropriateand necessary action is determined. Necessary action includes referringa case to another State because the absent parent has been, or is presumedto be, located there, as specified in proposed paragraph (b)(7). Once acase has been referred by the central registry in the responding Stateto the appropriate State or local IV-D agency for processing, that case,although an interstate case, must be worked like any intrastate case, inaccordance with the timeframes and standards in Part 303. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. </ITAG>Continued Location AttemptsWe believe it is critical for States to attempt periodically to locateabsent parents or sources of income in cases in which previous attemptshave been unsuccessful to determine whether location information has becomeavailable. Accordingly, we propose to require in paragraph (b)(8) thatthe IV-D agency must repeat location attempts quarterly in appropriatecases in which previous attempts have failed but adequate information existsto meet the requirements for submittal for location. This 3-month cyclemust coincide with quarterly updates to State employment security files.This requirement to repeat location attempts in cases in which prior locationattempts have failed is proposed because, as stated previously, often casesare closed or left unattended when insufficient effort has been made topursue the case, or to reevaluate it after initial attempts to proceedwere unsuccessful. We do not intend that States resubmit cases for locationattempts if there is inadequate identification information on the absentparent. However, if adequate information exists but previous attempts havefailed, States would be required to resubmit such cases because the subsequentattempts to locate may prove successful, e.g., the absent parent may havegotten a driver's license or a job. We specifically request comment onwhether annual checks against Federal automated data sources should berequired. As previously discussed, the advisory committee urged us to revise thelocation section to ensure that location services are provided expeditiouslyat any such point in case processing when the location of the absent parent,source(s) of income, etc, is unknown. Accordingly, we propose to requirein paragraph (9) that the IV-D agency must refer a case for location serviceswithin 5 working days of determining that location is necessary. This couldoccur at any time, for example, when the IV-D agency is in the processof establishing or modifying an order or enforcing an existing order. Oncethe case is referred for location services, the requirement and timeframesin andSection; 303.3(b) would again apply. Establishment of Support Obligations_Section 303.4 Current regulations at andSection; 303.4 set forth requirements for IV-Dagencies with regard to the establishment of support obligations in allcases referred to the IV-D agency or for which there are applications forIV-D services. We propose to amend andSection; 303.4 by adding a new paragraph(d) which would require the IV-D agency, within 30 working days of locatingthe absent parent or establishing paternity, to establish a support orderor file a petition with the court or administrative authority to establisha support obligation. As stated previously, Congress attempted to alleviate public concerns regardingthe lack of adequate and expeditious IV-D services by requiring in the1984 Amendments that States have and use expedited processes to establishand enforce support obligations. Those expedited processes, and the timeframesin implementing regulations at andSection; 303.101, only apply to cases oncethey are under administrative or judicial review. No corresponding timeframesexist within which IV-D agencies must file cases with the administrativeor expedited judicial authority for support order establishment or enforcement.The result is large backlogs of cases in IV-D offices. Section 121 of Pub.L. 100-485 adds a new section 452(h) to the Act which requires the Secretaryof HHS to impose timeframes within which States must respond to requestsfor assistance in establishing and enforcing support orders. The initial proposal we presented to the advisory committee required thatwithin 60 calendar days of locating the absent parent, the IV-D agencymust establish a support order or file a petition with the court or administrativeauthority to establish a support obligation. We have subsequently revisedthis due to the group's concerns. First, while we urge States to establishpaternity and a support order simultaneously except where prohibited byState law, the advisory committee believes that paternity and support ordersare often established in separate proceedings. For this reason, the committeeargued that the proposed timeframes should begin with locating the absentparent or establishing paternity. Because it is our intent that child supportcase processing flow quickly from one needed service to the next, we incorporatedthe advisory committee's suggestions in our proposal. Secondly, the advisory committee convinced us that 30 working days (ratherthan the 60 calendar days in our proposal) is adequate to either establishan order by consent or to petition the court or administrative authorityfor support. Again the committee convinced us that if a IV-D agency isunable to establish an order administratively by consent in less than sixweeks, a petition for support should be filed. We request comments, includingany alternatives based on experience, on this timeframe. Unless IV-D agencies process cases to the point of establishing an orderby consent or petitioning the court or administrative authority to establishan order and serving process, the expedited process system in place inmost States is useless. Timeframes for processing cases from applicationor referral of the case by the IV-D agency to establishment or enforcementof an order are necessary if we are to conform to Congressional intentin requiring expedited processes as part of the 1984 Amendments as wellas in requiring timeframes for providing services in Pub. L. 100-485_thatIV-D services be provided expeditiously. The proposed case processing timeframes contained in this regulation areintended to encompass all necessary actions up to the point where the expeditedprocesses timeframes requirements begin (i.e., a case is ``filed''). Therefore,there should not be a gap between the timeframe requirements containedin this proposed rule and the timeframe requirements for expedited processes.There is one further concern we would like to address. Currently, thereare no requirements governing situations where a petition for a supportorder is dismissed without prejudice. Because this may occur for variouslegitimate reasons (e.g., the absent parent is currently unemployed, etc.),we believe it is necessary to ensure that every effort is made to establisha support order if circumstances upon which the dismissal is based change.Accordingly, we propose in andSection; 303.4(e) that the IV-D agency mustexamine the reasons for dismissal, determine when it would be appropriateto seek an order in the future, and seek a support order at that time.Establishment of Paternity_Section 303.5 This proposed rule would revise current requirements for paternity establishmentat andSection; 303.5. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Paternity Establishment Within One Year</ITAG>As discussed previously, we propose to add timeframes for processing casesfrom the time of referral or application until the date the IV-D agencyfiles a petition or serves process to establish or enforce a child supportobligation with the court or administrative agency. Once a petition isfiled or service of process is completed (depending on which date triggersexpedited processes in the State), the required timeframes for expeditedprocesses apply and ensure that 100 percent of those cases are processedwithin one year of the date of filing or service. The exception to thisscenario are complex issue cases or cases requiring paternity establishment.The Child Support Enforcement Amendments of 1984 allow States to excludepaternity cases from their expedited processes. However, paternity establishmentis a crucial step in the child support enforcement process. In the pastStates have been lax in the establishment of paternity, as reflected inIV-D program audit results (32 of 43 States penalized as a result of FY1984, 1985 and 1986 audits were cited in paternity-related cases, eitherbecause of the State's failure to locate putative fathers or to establishpaternity.) Often, States do not bother to attempt location in cases needingpaternity establishment. Because of these audit results and the fact thatpaternity establishment cases are not subject to expedited process requirementsunless the State opts to include them, we believe it is essential to seta time standard for establishing paternity. We believe that strengthened paternity establishment standards and timelimits are essential to improve State IV-D program performance. Therefore,we propose to amend andSection; 303.5(a) to require that the IV-D agencymust, within one year of locating the alleged father, establish paternityby court order or other legal process established under State law, establishpaternity by voluntary acknowledgment if under current law such acknowledgmenthas the same effect as court-ordered paternity, or exclude the allegedfather as a result of genetic tests. We want to stress, however, that theone-year time limit is intended as an outer limit. We urge States to attemptto establish paternity by voluntary acknowledgment or legal process immediatelyupon location of the alleged father, simultaneously with the establishmentof an order if not prohibited by State law. The advisory committee wasconcerned that we include reference to cases in which paternity cannotbe established because the putative father is excluded. Therefore, we haveadded this reference but limited it to exclusion as a result of genetictests. We specifically request comment on whether there should be separatetime requirements for uncontested paternity cases. While this one-year timeframe may seem on its face to ignore cases in whichpaternity establishment may be difficult if not impossible, it is imperativeto underscore the need to strengthen paternity establishment requirementsbecause of the current exclusion of paternity establishment cases fromthe expedited processes requirements and the low priority States have giventhis essential function of child support enforcement. We consulted withthe advisory committee with regard to the limited number of paternity caseswhich are impossible to resolve within one year despite the State's everyeffort. The committee believes that these very limited number of caseswould easily be accounted for within the 25 percent margin allowed as partof the 75 percent substantial compliance audit standard. At such time asaudit regulations are revised for consistency with case processing timeframesand program standards, a State would be cited in an audit if it failedto establish paternity or exclude the alleged father (discussed below)within one year in 75 percent of the cases reviewed for the audit. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Exclusion of the Alleged Fathers </ITAG>Proposed andSection; 303.5 would require that the IV-D agency must establishpaternity or exclude the alleged father as a result of genetic tests withinone year of locating the alleged father. In our discussions with the committee,questions were raised about whether or not IV-D agencies must pursue allalleged fathers or only one. To encompass situations where more than onealleged father has been identified, we propose to require in andSection;303.5(a)(2) that the IV-D agency must meet the requirements set forth inparagraph (a)(1) of this section for each alleged father identified, untilpaternity is established or each alleged father is excluded. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Use of Laboratories Which Perform Genetic Testing at CompetitiveRates </ITAG>Furthermore, this proposed regulation would revise current paragraph (c)to require IV-D agencies to identify and use laboratories which performgenetic testing at reasonable cost through competitive procurement. Inthe interest of competition and associated cost benefits, we deleted thereference limiting identification of laboratories to those within the State.State IV-D statistical and expenditure reports show vast differences inwhat States pay for genetic tests. The range, based on voluntary reportingof laboratory costs, is between $300 and $1500 per test. Effective October1, 1988, as a result of Pub. L. 100-485, the Federal government pays 90percent of the costs of genetic tests. To avoid situations where Statesuse laboratories at exorbitant cost when there may be a laboratory availablewhich performs comparable testing at more reasonable cost, OCSE will investigatewhat laboratories throughout the country charge for comparable genetictests and report that data to States. This proposed rule also would add the word ``genetic'' before ``tests''in proposed paragraph (c) to more accurately reflect the advancements in,and increased refinement of, testing methods to determine paternity. Currentparagraph (b) would not be changed. To correspond with these proposed changes, andSection; 304.20(b)(2) wouldbe revised by changing the reference to blood tests to genetic tests andthe reference to andSection; 303.5(b) to andSection; 303.5(c). Enforcement of Support Obligations_Section 303.6 This proposed regulation would revise current requirements at andSection;303.6 by deleting the enforcement techniques listed in paragraphs (a) through(f) and adding monitoring and enforcement requirements in new paragraphs(a) through (c). <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Monitoring Compliance With Orders and Identifying Delinquencies</ITAG>Current regulations at andSection; 303.6 require that the IV-D agency, forall cases under the State plan in which the obligation to support and theamount of the obligation have been established, must maintain an effectivesystem for identifying, within 30 days, those cases in which there is afailure to comply with the support obligation and to contact such delinquentindividuals as soon as possible in order to enforce the obligations andobtain the current support obligation and any arrearages.Despite the above requirement that States must monitor cases, some IV-Dagencies still rely on custodial parents informing them of a delinquencybefore they investigate compliance with the obligation and take actionto enforce it. Effective and timely monitoring of compliance is essentialin order to trigger income withholding in accordance with statutory requirementsand to ensure timely use of other enforcement techniques as appropriate.In addition, the statutory provision for States to have and use proceduresfor withholding wages or income requires that the absent parent becomesubject to withholding and that advance notice of the withholding be sentto the absent parent, at the latest, on the date on which the parent failsto make payments in an amount equal to the support payable for one month.Therefore, it is imperative that States identify delinquencies immediatelyin all cases when the debt equals the amount payable for one month. Statesmay not wait 30 days after there is a delinquency to identify the delinquency.We specifically request comment on whether the requirement for sendingnotice to a delinquent absent parent should be amended from ``the Statemust take steps * * * to send the advance notice'' on the day the delinquencyreaches one month's support to ``the State must send the advance notice''on that day. We also specifically request comment on whether States shouldbe required to process uncontested wage withholding cases more quicklythan contested cases. We propose to delete the current 30-day timeframe and address the above-mentionedissues in several ways. First, proposed andSection; 303.6(a) would requirethat the IV-D agency maintain and use an effective system for monitoringcompliance with the support obligation. Advisory members encouraged usto clarify that monitoring includes monitoring of medical as well as cashsupport provisions of support orders. Under current requirements, the IV-Dagency must communicate periodically with the Medicaid agency to determineif there have been lapses in health insurance coverage for Medicaid applicantsand recipients. The IV-D agency then must take appropriate action to enforcethe order when the Medicaid agency informs the IV-D agency that the absentparent has failed to secure health insurance coverage as ordered, or thathealth insurance coverage has lapsed. We request comment on whether wagewithholding notices to employers should: (a) inform the employer when enrollmentin employment based medical insurance has also been required by the supportorder, (b) request the employer to alert the IV-D agency if the absentparent has not enrolled the child(ren) in required medical insurance and(c) request the employer to enroll the child(ren) if the absent parenthas not, where permitted by State law. Additionally, we propose to require in paragraph (b) that the IV-D agencymaintain and use an effective system for identifying those cases in whichthere is a failure to comply with the support obligation on the date theparent fails to make payments in an amount equal to the support payablefor one month or earlier in accordance with State law. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Enforcement Actions </ITAG>We would require in paragraphs (c) (1) and (2) that the State must initiatewage withholding in accordance with the requirements of andSection; 303.100,and initiate any other appropriate enforcement technique, except Federalor State tax refund offset (which are available only once a year), within30 working days of identifying a delinquency or other support-related non-compliancewith the order. The committee supported this proposal. This requirement would include taking appropriate enforcement action within30 working days of notification of non-compliance with an order requiringhealth insurance coverage. In accordance with current medical support requirements,States must attempt to enforce a requirement in a support order that anabsent parent obtain health insurance in cases of non-compliance with suchan order. The enforcement action must be taken within 30 working days ofbeing informed that the absent parent has failed to obtain health insuranceor within 30 working days of being notified of a lapse in such coverage.In Medicaid-eligible cases, this would be within 30 working days of beinginformed by the State Medicaid agency of such non-compliance and in allother cases where the custodial parent has consented to such services,this would be within 30 working days of being notified by the custodialparent of non-compliance with the health insurance aspect of an order.Section 302.70(b) specifies that a State need not apply procedures forState income tax refund offset, imposition of liens against real and personalproperty, giving security, posting a bond or giving some other guaranteeto secure payment of support, or providing information on the amount ofoverdue support to consumer reporting agencies in a particular case ``ifthe State determines that it is not appropriate using guidelines generallyavailable to the public which take into account the payment record of theabsent parent, the availability of other remedies, and other relevant considerations.The guidelines may not determine a majority of cases in which no otherremedy is being used to be inappropriate.'' Therefore, if a State has developedguidelines specifying when use of these enforcement techniques would beinappropriate, the requirement in proposed andSection; 303.6(c)(2) to initiateany appropriate enforcement technique within 30 working days would notapply if use of the technique is inappropriate in a given case, in accordancewith those guidelines. When use of a specific enforcement action requires service of process,process must be served within 10 working days of request for service ofprocess, in accordance with andSection; 303.9 of this proposed rule. This10-day timeframe must be met within the 30 working day period proposedunder andSection; 303.6(c)(2) for enforcement action. Service of processis often an essential step in taking enforcement actions and traditionallymany of the delays in providing support enforcement services are delayscaused by slow service of process. The advisory committee indicated itis important to place a time limit on serving process and we propose thatthe service of process be accomplished as part of the overall timeframefor taking the necessary enforcement action. Proposed andSection; 303.9 whichaddresses service of process requirements is discussed in more detail below.With regard to Federal and State income tax refund offset, we propose torequire in paragraph (c)(3) that States submit all cases which meet thecertification requirements for State tax refund offset once a year, inaccordance with andSection; 303.102 and State guidelines developed underandSection; 302.70(b), and for Federal tax refund offset in accordance withandSection; 303.72. Federal and State income tax refund offset are particularlyeffective and efficient mechanisms for enforcing support orders. However,States have not taken full advantage of Federal tax refund offset as evidencedby vastly different State submission practices. To ensure maximum use ofthese effective enforcement techniques, cases meeting the certificationrequirements for Federal and State income tax refund offset, as set forthin andSection;andSection; 303.72 and 303.102, must be submitted. We propose to require in paragraph (c)(4) that in cases where previousenforcement attempts have been unsuccessful, the State must initiate appropriateenforcement techniques where it becomes aware of changes in the factorswhich determine the ability to use an enforcement technique. Because itis not acceptable to ignore cases when previous enforcement efforts havefailed, States would be required to examine the factors quarterly. TheState must keep abreast of case circumstances to determine when the potentialfor resumed enforcement efforts occurs and take all necessary actions inaccordance with andSection; 303.6 (c)(1) through (c)(3).Because of the proposed changes discussed above, we propose to delete thecurrent list of enforcement techniques in current andSection; 303.6(a) through(f). There is no reason to list some enforcement actions or to try to listall techniques since States are required to take whatever enforcement actionis warranted in a particular case. Service of Process_Section 303.9 Service of process is a necessary element in child support establishmentand enforcement cases and many delays in providing services are directlycaused by slow and ineffective attempts to serve process. As specified in OCSE-AT-88-19, expedited processes timeframes apply beginningwith the date a case is filed. A State may interpret ``case filing'' tomean the date the absent parent is served or the date a case is filed.If a State's trigger for the expedited processes timeframes is the dateof successful service of process, service must be completed within theproposed case processing timeframes contained in this regulation. Alternatively,if a State's trigger for the expedited processes timeframe is the datea case is filed, service of process must occur within those expedited processestimeframes. The committee discussed at length that it is crucial to place a time limiton requesting and serving process within the overall timeframes for takingcertain actions. They were concerned that a case's forward movement notbe halted because service of process is slow or not given adequate attention.Accordingly, we propose to add a new section andSection; 303.9 to requirethat when service of process is necessary at any point in case processing,service of process must be requested within 2 working days of determinationthat service of process is necessary and must be completed, in accordancewith paragraph (b), within, not in addition to, the overall timeframesfor location, establishment of paternity and support orders, and enforcement.Paragraph (b) would require process to be served within 10 working daysof the request for service of process. In order to meet these timeframes, States will need to remedy deficienciesin service of process procedures. Committee members urged us to state clearlyin this discussion the fact that, if IV-D agencies encounter difficultyin obtaining adequate and timely responses to requests for service of process,Federal funding at the applicable matching rate is available for the costsof hiring process servers or otherwise purchasing such services as necessaryexpenditures under the IV-D program. In addition, we urge States to examinealternatives to personal service and redefine what constitutes serviceof process. We believe that alternatives such as mail service and use ofpublic or private process services on a performance-related contact basiscan meet due process concerns and improve attempts to serve process. Simpleand effective practices are described in an OCSE Service of Process monographpublished in May of 1987 and other OCSE materials. We recognize that there may be cases in which service of process takesan extended period of time or is impossible because an absent parent successfullyavoids service. However, we discussed these concerns with the advisorycommittee and the committee was comfortable with the belief that this percentageof cases is small enough to be encompassed in the 25 percent margin allowedunder the contemplated 75 percent audit standard. We encourage commentsin this area. Procedures for Case Assessment and Prioritization_Section 303.10 Because States may prioritize their IV-D caseload in accordance with therequirements for case assessment and prioritization at andSection; 303.10,we are clarifying the State's responsibility for meeting the proposed requirementscontained in this regulation if the State has a prioritization system.As stated in the preamble to the final rule, Procedures for Case Assessmentand Prioritization (49 FR 36773, published September 19, 1984), the purposeof case prioritization is to improve case management, not to limit IV-Dservices. States are required to undertake to secure support and establishpaternity in all cases. However, a State may use various case characteristicsto determine the order in which cases will be worked. In previous sections of this proposed rule, we have stressed the overwhelmingneed for more stringent requirements and standards for paternity establishmentand the establishment and enforcement of support obligations. Because wehave never intended that case prioritization schemes limit IV-D services,we believe it is necessary to clarify in the regulations governing caseprioritization that the requirements in Part 303 must be met if a Stateimplements a case prioritization system. Therefore, we propose to add toandSection; 303.10(a) that, if a State adopts a case assessment and prioritizationsystem, the IV-D agency must continue to meet the timeframes and case processingstandards contained in Part 303. We believe this addition is necessaryto clarify that prioritizing cases may not result in impeding case processing.Current andSection; 303.10(b)(5) requires a State, in implementing a caseassessment and prioritization system, to prioritize cases after reviewingall intake information for accuracy and completeness and, if review indicatesthat additional information is needed, prioritize only after attemptingto verify or secure the information. We propose to cross reference proposedandSection; 303.2 in andSection; 303.10(b)(5) to ensure that cases are prioritizedonly after the requirements for establishment of cases and maintenanceof case records in proposed andSection; 303.2 are met. Although we are proposingto reference all of Part 303 in andSection; 303.10(a), as mentioned above,we believe that adding a reference to andSection; 303.2 in paragraph (b)(5)is necessary because the initial actions required in proposed andSection;303.2 are essential to ensure adequate information is available on a casebefore a State determines the priority of working that case. Finally, we propose to tie the case processing requirements in Part 303to the requirement for periodic review of low priority cases containedin current andSection; 303.10(b)(6). We propose to add to paragraph (b)(6)that periodic review of low priority cases must be in accordance with thestandards set forth in Part 303, such as quarterly location attempts. Case Closure Criteria_Section 303.11 Proposed andSection; 303.11 would establish criteria States must use to determinewhether child support cases may be closed. Current regulations are silentregarding any criteria which States must apply in evaluating caseloadsfor the purpose of case closure. This proposal would require State IV-Dagencies to establish standards for closing cases which would limit casesthe State may close to those in which there is no reasonable expectationof establishing paternity, obtaining a support order, or collecting childor spousal support, either now or in the foreseeable future. These criteriawill ensure that dependent children and their custodial parents have thebenefit of all the support enforcement services available where the potentialfor paternity establishment or establishment and enforcement of supportexists. Any case not meeting at least one of the standards for closuremust remain open and be worked by the State IV-D agency.The establishment of a system of case closure will allow States to moreeffectively pursue cases in which circumstances pose reasonable expectationsthat support enforcement services will result in paternity or support orderestablishment and the enforcement of orders. State IV-D agencies will beable to close cases with little or no potential for success, currentlyand in the foreseeable future, and focus their resources on cases withestablishment or enforcement potential. The GAO report mentioned previously noted that the prioritization regulationsdid not specifically address case closure and applied only to those Stateswhich opted to use case prioritization procedures. The GAO found that fiveof the eight sample IV-D offices reviewed for the report did not have writtenprioritization procedures, and that a significant number of cases wereclosed by the offices prematurely without adequately pursuing the establishmentof paternity and support orders. The report recommended that OCSE developcase closure criteria for IV-D agencies to ensure that efforts to determinepaternity and obtain support orders and provide other assistance are adequate.It is in the best interests of both children and their custodial parents,as well as State IV-D agencies, that clearly defined regulatory standardsbe established for case closure. At the present time each State may establishcase closure criteria, subject only to the requirements mentioned above.Where the State has no standards for case closure and does not periodicallyevaluate unworkable cases, the IV-D agency is forced to spread availableresources inefficiently, resulting in less than effective service givento cases with demonstrated potential for success. In other circumstances,the lack of standards for case closure, or the establishment of standardswhich are too broad, can result in the arbitrary closing of cases whichshould have remained open, and the failure to establish paternity and supportorders or to collect needed support. Some States have shown that a careful delineation of case closure criteriacan result in program performance improvements; refocusing resources formerlyspent unproductively can increase support order establishment and enforcement.In the summer of 1987, OCSE collected and evaluated available informationregarding existing State practices and case closure criteria and used thisinformation in developing these proposed criteria. The advisory committee reviewed and discussed the proposed criteria. Membersof the committee agreed with the need for case closure criteria and supportthe proposed criteria discussed below as reasonable. If a case does not meet at least one of the following proposed criteria,it must be kept open and worked. However, because current regulations atandSection; 303.10 allow States to establish procedures for case prioritization,States may distinguish between those cases with current success potentialand those which do not now, but may in the future, have potential for success.This latter group could include the cases which do not meet the criteriafor closure but in which the next required case processing step cannotbe taken. Requirements for periodic review in andSection; 303.10 governingcase prioritization systems, and elsewhere in Part 303, would apply inthese cases. The proposed andSection; 303.11 would be entitled ``Case closure criteria.''A new paragraph (a) would require States to establish a system for caseclosure. Paragraph (b) would establish the criteria for case closure eligibility.Paragraph (b)(1) would allow closure of a case where the child has reachedthe age of majority, there is no longer a current support order, and eitherno arrearages are owed or arrearages are under $150. We believe that thiswill allow States to reduce caseloads where there is no longer a minorchild and arrearages are relatively small. This provision would also ensurethat an obligor could not avoid support obligations by evading their supportresponsibilities until the child reached the age of majority if the amountof past-due support owed was substantial (i.e., over $150). Proposed andSection; 303.11(b)(2) would allow case closure where the childhas not reached the age of majority, arrearages are less than $150, andthere is no longer a current support order. Circumstances in which a childhas not reached the age of majority but there is no longer a current supportorder might include termination of parental rights or reconciliation ofthe child's parents. Termination of parental rights might occur in caseswhere the child has been legally adopted or has become legally emancipatedthrough marriage. In cases where the parents have reconciled, there wouldno longer be an absent parent. Proposed andSection; 303.11(b)(3) would allow a State to close a case uponthe death of the absent parent, or putative father, if there are no resourcesavailable in the estate from which to recover support. A delinquent absentparent may have assets which he or she has protected from collection procedures,and the parent's death may release these assets for collection by the IV-Dagency. States should establish routine procedures for ascertaining theextent of any assets which may be available, including availability ofassets upon the death of an absent parent. In the case of the death ofa putative father, the IV-D agency should also continue to pursue a paternityaction to conclusion if there are assets which can be identified, includingsocial security or other retirement survivors' benefits. Under proposed paragraph (b)(4), the IV-D agency may close cases in which,either the child is at least 18 years old and the action is barred by astatute of limitations which meets the requirements of andSection; 302.70(a)(5),or the putative father is excluded and no other putative father can beidentified. Requiring the IV-D agency to keep cases open beyond this pointwill serve no useful purpose. In addition, paragraph (b)(4) would specifythat, in accordance with andSection; 303.5(b), the IV-D agency need not attemptto establish paternity in any case involving incest or forcible rape, orin any case where legal proceedings for adoption are pending, if, in theopinion of the IV-D agency, it would not be in the best interests of thechild to establish paternity. Although proposed paragraph (b)(4) would allow closure of cases needingpaternity establishment under specific, limited conditions, we urge Statesto make every effort, using all resources available, to establish paternityin every case which requires such action.Proposed paragraph (b)(5) would allow case closure where the IV-D agencyhas been unable to locate an absent parent despite having made repeatedlocation efforts using multiple sources, including those listed under andSection;303.3, over a three-year period. We believe that, if a State has made suchefforts, the likelihood of success beyond the three-year period is extremelylow. However, we are particularly interested in receiving comments on thethree-year, or any other, timeframe in this proposal. Comments on individualor State experience which may support or discredit these proposed timeframesare encouraged. Paragraph (b)(6) would allow case closure if the absent parent is unableto pay support during the duration of the child's minority because he orshe has been institutionalized for at least five years or is incarceratedwith a sentence of at least 12 years remaining to be served with no chancefor parole. In such cases, the State must also determine that no incomeor assets are available to the absent parent which could be levied or attached.Income would include earnings while incarcerated. In the case of an institutionalizedor incarcerated parent where the timeframes established above have notbeen met, a IV-D agency which prioritizes cases in accordance with andSection;303.10 may wish to place the case in a low priority file and review thecase periodically for available assets and to determine any change in status.Paragraph (b)(7) would allow a case to be closed when the absent parentis a citizen of, and lives in, a foreign country, does not work for theUnited States government or a company which has its headquarters or officesin the United States, and has no reachable domestic income or assets; andthe State has been unable to establish reciprocity with the country. Ifthe absent parent resides abroad and the case does not qualify for closureunder the above criteria (i.e., reciprocity has been established, or theparent works for a U.S. agency or a company with headquarters or officesin the United States), the State should have a good chance of establishingpaternity or establishing and enforcing support. In addition, if an absentparent residing abroad meets all the other criteria for closure in thissubparagraph, but is a U.S. citizen, the case should not be closed, sincea return to the United States is a possibility. Such cases may qualifyfor inclusion in a suspense file established under andSection; 303.10. Paragraph (b)(8) would allow a case to be closed if the resident parent,legal guardian, attorney, or agent of a child requested the State parentlocator service (PLS) to submit a request to the Federal PLS under theprovisions of andSection; 302.35(c)(3) and the location services have beencompleted. The advisory committee asked that we clarify that this is aspecial category of cases in which Federal PLS access only, not full IV-Dservices, is requested. Paragraph (b)(9) would allow case closure in a non-AFDC case or in a formerAFDC, Medicaid or foster care (title IV-E) case when the custodial parentrequests that the case be closed and there are no arrearages assigned tothe State. No such option is available to the custodial parent in an openAFDC, Medicaid or foster care case where support has been assigned to theState in accordance with section 402(a)(26) or 1912 of the Act. Paragraph (b)(10) would allow the IV-D agency to close a case when it hasbeen notified by the IV-A or IV-E agency, in accordance with andSection;302.31(c), that there has been a finding of good cause for the recipient'sfailure to cooperate in obtaining support and the IV-A or IV-E agency hasdetermined that paternity establishment or support establishment and enforcementmay not proceed without risk or harm to the child or caretaker relative.Paragraph (c) would require the State, 60 calendar days prior to any caseclosure because of criteria in paragraphs (b) (1) through (7), to notifythe custodial parent in writing of the State's intent to close the case.If a case is closed, the custodial parent may request at a later date thatthe case be reopened if there is a change in circumstances which couldlead to the establishment of paternity or a support order, or enforcementof an order. Paragraph (d) would require the IV-D agency to retain all records for casesclosed pursuant to this section for a minimum of three years, in accordancewith 45 CFR Part 74, Subpart D. However, because some families tend to remain on AFDC for long periodsof time or leave and then return to the AFDC rolls, States should considerkeeping at least minimal information on closed AFDC IV-D cases (e.g., thedate and the reason for closure) to avoid duplication of effort shouldthe case be referred again for IV-D services at some, much later, date.Minimal Organizational and Staffing Requirements_Section 303.20 We believe that the goal of efficient and effective IV-D programs cannotbe achieved unless States and localities have an organizational structureand sufficient resources to meet the performance and time standards proposedin this rule. Therefore, we propose to amend current andSection; 303.20(c),minimal organizational and staffing requirements, by requiring that theremust be an organizational structure and sufficient resources at the Stateor local level to meet the performance standards contained in Part 303.To further ensure effective child support programs, we propose to amendcurrent andSection; 303.20 by adding a new paragraph (g) which would statethat, if it is determined as a result of an audit under Part 305 that aState is not in substantial compliance with title IV-D of the Act, theSecretary will evaluate whether insufficient program resources were a contributingfactor and, if necessary, may prescribe specific standards for the State.We discussed the subject of adequate staffing and sufficient resourceswith the committee. They agreed that inadequate resources, e.g., insufficientstaff and inadequate computer capabilities, often result in poor childsupport services. Perceived resource deficiencies may also stem from orbe exacerbated by fragmented and inefficient organizational arrangements,poor work flow, inadequate policies and procedures, and lack of staff training,among other factors. The committee could offer no clear solution to theproblem other than States need to focus attention on child support effortsand realign priorities and/or increase available resources to realize thepotential of the program's goals. The fact is that, although there is ageneral requirement that States adequately staff and manage IV-D programsto ensure compliance with Federal requirements, this requirement has neverbeen quantified and thus many have not done so. Each State should examinethe overall management and operation of it's IV-D program and, as necessary,consider transferring existing resources or reordering priorities for thebenefit of the program which has a high potential for generating revenuesfor the State as well as for ensuring support for those in need.Finally, for consistency with the previously mentioned proposal to deletethe list of enforcement techniques in andSection; 303.6, we propose to amendandSection; 303.20(c)(7) by replacing the list of available enforcement techniqueswith a requirement that the activities to enforce collection of supportmust include wage withholding and other available enforcement techniques.Incentive Payments to States and Political Subdivisions_Section 303.52and Proposed Section 304.12 Current andSection; 303.52 sets forth requirements governing incentive paymentsto both States and political subdivisions. Because regulations for incentivepayments, for the most part, govern a financial aspect of the program anddo not therefore properly belong in Part 303, which establishes programstandards, OCSE is proposing to transfer andSection; 303.52 (a), (b) and(c) to 45 CFR Part 304, Federal Financial Participation. We are proposingthis technical change because we believe that this section would be moreappropriately located in Part 304 since it is not directly related to programoperations. Accordingly, current 45 CFR 303.52(d) would be redesignatedas andSection; 303.52. Furthermore, we propose to change the section title,Incentive payments to States and political subdivisions, to Pass-throughof incentives to political subdivisions, since this is the only requirementremaining in this section. To implement the provisions of sections 103(e) and 127 of Pub. L. 100-485,we propose to amend regulations governing incentive payments (proposedandSection; 304.12) in two ways. First, we propose to implement section 127,which amends section 458(d) of the Act to exclude the costs of interstategrants when computing incentive payments, by revising paragraph (b)(4)(v)to state that, effective January 1, 1990, in calculating the amount ofincentive payments, amounts expended by the State in carrying out a specialproject under section 455(e) of the Act shall not be included in the State'stotal IV-D administrative costs. In addition, we propose to implement section103(e) of Pub. L. 100-485 by adding a new paragraph (vi) which would statethat the costs of demonstration projects for evaluating model proceduresfor reviewing child support awards under section 103(e) of Pub. L. 100-485shall not be included in a State's total IV-D administrative costs forpurposes of computing incentives. For consistency with the redesignation of most of andSection; 303.52 as andSection;304.12, all references to andSection; 302.52 (a) through (c) in other regulationswould be changed to refer to andSection; 304.12. Medical Support Enforcement_Part 306 Currently, Part 306 is divided into two subparts. Current Subpart A containsrequirements governing optional cooperative agreements and Subpart B containsrequired IV-D medical support activities. Because Subpart B contains medicalsupport enforcement requirements which should more appropriately appearin Part 303, we propose to move the requirements under current SubpartB (andSection; 306.50, Securing medical support information, and andSection;306.51, Securing medical support obligations) to Part 303 as new andSection;andSection;303.30 and 303.31, respectively. The regulations under current SubpartA would remain as Part 306 without the heading of Subpart A. For consistency with the changes and redesignations within Part 306, allreferences in program regulations to regulations in current Part 306 wouldbe changed to reflect the transfer of the contents of Subpart B to Part303 and the redesignation of Subpart A of Part 306 as Part 306. <ITAG tagnum="84">Economic Impact </ITAG>The Child Support Enforcement program was established under title IV-Dof the Act by the Social Services Amendments of 1974, for the purposesof enforcing the support obligations owed by absent parents to their children,locating absent parents, establishing paternity and obtaining child support.The IV-D program collected some $4.7 billion in FY 1988_over $1.5 billionon behalf of children receiving AFDC and the remainder on behalf of childrennot receiving AFDC. State and local expenditures amounted to $1.2 billion.Collections for AFDC families, after a $50 disregard, are used to offsetthe costs of assistance payments made to such families. The intent of thisproposed regulation is to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of IV-Dprograms. Because this proposed rule strengthens and clarifies existingprogram operations regulations, it is expected that State performance willimprove and cases will be worked more effectively. Any increase in administrativecosts will be minimized if States transfer existing resources to concentrateon child support enforcement efforts and will be more than offset by anincrease in collections. The principal impact of the regulation will beon State operations. State expenditures may increase initially; however,we believe that the increase will be more than offset by the increase incollections, and therefore, a net savings to State governments will result.<ITAG tagnum="84">Executive Order 12291 </ITAG>The Secretary has determined, in accordance with Executive Order 12291that this rule does not constitute a ``major'' rule. A major rule is onethat is likely to result in: (1) An annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more; (2) A major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individual industries,Federal, State, or local government agencies, or geographic regions; or(3) Significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.This rule clarifies and strengthens current regulations governing IV-Dprogram operations and any increase in administrative costs to the Stateswill be more than offset by increased collections under the program. IfStates reallocate existing resources to concentrate efforts on child supportenforcement, the return on that investment of resources will far exceedany initial increase in cost to the State.The proposed case closure criteria contained in andSection; 303.9 shouldresult in improved performance of State IV-D agencies because it will ensurethat available resources are focused on IV-D cases in which there is apotential for paternity establishment and support order establishment andenforcement. It will allow States to close unworkable cases and improvethe management of their caseloads. Increased efforts focused on workablecases should result in increased collections, and in AFDC cases, increasedsavings to the State and Federal governments.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Analysis</ITAG>The Secretary certifies, under 5 U.S.C. 605(b), as enacted by the RegulatoryFlexibility Act (Pub. L. 96-354), that this regulation will not resultin a significant impact on a substantial number of small entities. Theprimary impact is on State governments and individuals, which are not consideredsmall entities under the Act.<ITAG tagnum="84">Lists of Subjects</ITAG>45 CFR Parts 301, 303 and 304Child support, Grant programs_social programs, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements.45 CFR Part 302Child support, Grant programs_social programs, Penalties, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements, Unemployment compensation.45 CFR Part 306Child support, Grant programs_social programs, Medicaid, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements.45 CFR Part 307Child support, Grant programs_social programs, Computer technology, Reportingand recordkeeping requirements.<ITAG tagnum="21">(Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance Program No. 13.783, ChildSupport Enforcement Program.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: April 6, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Catherine Bertini,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Director, Office of Child Support Enforcement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: April 6, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Louis W. Sullivan,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG>For the reasons set forth in the preamble, 45 CFR Parts 301 through 304,306 and 307 are proposed to be amended as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 301_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 301 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 651 through 658, 660, 664, 666, 667, 1302,1396a(a)(25), 1396b(d)(2), 1396b(o), 1396b(p) and 1396(k).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 301.1, 306.1, and 303.52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>2. Section 301.1 is amended by moving the definitions of ``Medicaid agency''and ``Medicaid'' which are currently in andSection; 306.1 (b) and (c) andremoving the paragraph designations, and inserting the definitions afterthe definition of ``IV-D agency'' and by moving the definition of ``Politicalsubdivision'' which is currently in andSection; 303.52(a) and inserting itafter the definition of ``Past-due support''.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 302_[AMENDED]</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 302 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 651 through 658, 660, 664, 666, 667, 1302,1396a(a)(25), 1396b(d)(2), 1396b(o), 1396b(p), and 1396(k).</ITAG>2. Section 302.32 is amended by the revising the first sentence of paragraph(b) and adding paragraph (f) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Support payments to the IV-D agency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG>(b) The IV-D agency must inform the State's IV-A agency of the amount ofthe collection which represents payment on the required support obligationfor the month as determined in andSection; 302.51(a) within 10 working daysfrom the date of receipt by the IV-D agency responsible for final distributionof the collection. * * *<ITAG tagnum="37"> * * * * *</ITAG>(f)<T3> Timeframes for distribution of support payments.</T3> (1) In interstateIV-D cases, amounts collected by the responding State on behalf of theinitiating State must be forwarded to the initiating State within 10 workingdays of the initial point of receipt in the responding State, in accordancewith andSection; 303.7(c)(7)(iv).(2) Amounts collected by the IV-D agency on behalf of current recipientsof aid under the State's title IV-A or IV-E plan for whom an assignmentunder andSection; 232.11 of this title or section 471(a)(17) of the Act iseffective shall be distributed as follows:(i) Payments to the family in AFDC cases under andSection; 302.51(b)(1) ofthis part must be made within 15 working days of the date of initial receiptin the State. (ii) Except as specified under paragraph (f)(1)(iv) of this section, collectionsdistributed under andSection; 302.51(b) (2) through (5) of this part mustbe distributed within 15 working days of notice of eligibility redeterminationby the IV-A agency, but may be distributed prior to eligibility redeterminationat the IV-D agency's discretion. (iii) Except as specified in paragraph (f)(1)(iv) of this section, collectionsin title IV-E foster care cases must be distributed within 15 working daysof the date of initial receipt in the State. (iv) Collections as a result of Federal or State tax refund offset mustbe distributed in AFDC cases under andSection; 302.51(b) (4) and (5) andin title IV-E foster care cases under andSection; 302.52(b) (3) and (4) within15 working days of the date of initial receipt in the State. (3) Amounts collected on behalf of individuals receiving services underandSection; 302.33 of this part shall be distributed as follows: (i) Amounts collected which represent payment on the current support obligationshall be paid to the family within 15 working days of the date of initialreceipt in the State. (ii) Except as specified in paragraph (f)(2)(iii), if the amount collectedis more than the amount required to be distributed in paragraph (f)(2)(i)of this section, the State may at its discretion either pay such amountsto the family to satisfy past-due support within 15 working days of thedate of initial receipt in the State or retain such amounts as have beenassigned to satisfy assistance paid to the family which has not been reimbursed.(iii) Amounts collected as a result of Federal income tax refund offsetto satisfy past-due support in non-AFDC cases shall be distributed underandSection; 302.51(b) (4) and (5) within 15 working days of the date of initialreceipt in the State, except as provided in andSection; 303.72(h)(5) of thischapter. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>3. Section 302.51 is amended by changing all references to ``andSection;303.52'' to ``andSection; 304.l2,'' by removing the sentence ``In any casein which collections are received by an entity other than the agency responsiblefor final distribution under this section, the entity must transmit thecollection within 10 days of receipt.'' in paragraph (a), and by removingthe sentence ``This payment shall be made in the month following the monthin which the amount of the collection was used to redetermine eligibilityfor an assistance payment under the State's title IV-A plan.'' in paragraphs(b) (3) and (5). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 302.55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>4. Section 302.55 is amended by changing reference to ``andSection; 303.52''to ``andSection; 304.12'' and the reference to ``andSection; 303.52(d)'' to``andSection; 303.52''.<ITAG tagnum="80">302.80</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>5. Section 302.80 is amended by removing the words ``Subpart A of'' inparagraph (a) and replacing the words ``Subpart B of Part 306'' in paragraph(b) with the words ``andSection;andSection; 303.30 and 303.31''. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 303_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 303 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 651 through 658, 660, 663, 664, 666, 667,1302, 1396a(a)(25), 1396b(d)(2), 1396b(o), 1396b(p) and 1396(k).</ITAG>2. Part 303 is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>a. Section 303.0 is amended by removing the words ``effective July 1, 1975;''in paragraph (a). b. Section 303.2 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishment of cases and maintenance of case records. </ITAG>(a) The IV-D agency must: (1) Make applications for child support services readily accessible tothe public; (2) Provide applications on the day an individual requests an applicationor services. Information describing available services, the individual'srights and responsibilities, and the State's fees, cost recovery and distributionpolicies must accompany all applications for services; and (3) Accept an application as filed on the day it is received. An applicationis a written document provided by the State which indicates that the individualis seeking assistance with a child support problem and is signed by theindividual applying for IV-D services. (b) For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for servicesunder andSection; 302.33 of this chapter, the IV-D agency must open a casewithin two working days of receipt of referral or application for servicesby establishing a case record. The case record must be supplemented withall information and documents pertaining to the case, as well as all relevantfacts, dates, actions taken, contacts made and results in a case. (c) Within 15 working days of receipt of referral of a case or of an applicationfor services under andSection; 302.33, based on an assessment of the caseto determine necessary action: (1) Solicit necessary and relevant information from the custodial parentand other relevant sources and initiate verification of information; (2) Access all appropriate State and local automated sources to determinethe absent parent's address, employer, income and assets, if necessary;(3) If there is adequate location information to proceed with the case,initiate appropriate service within 2 working days of determination ofnext appropriate action or service; and (4) If there is inadequate location information to proceed with the case,request additional information or refer the case for further location attempts,as specified in andSection; 303.3. c. Section 303.3 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Location of absent parents. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Definition. </T3>``Location'' means the confirmed physical whereaboutsof the absent parent, his or her employer(s), other sources of income and/orassets. (b) For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for servicesunder andSection; 302.33 of this chapter, the IV-D agency must attempt tolocate all absent parents or sources of income and/or assets when theirlocation is unknown. Under this standard, the IV-D agency must: (1) Use appropriate local locate sources such as officials and employeesadministering public assistance, general assistance, medical assistance,food stamps and social services (whether such individuals are employedby the State or a political subdivision), relatives and friends of theabsent parent, current or past employers, the local telephone company,the U.S. Postal Service, financial references, unions, fraternal organizations,and police, parole, and probation records if appropriate; (2) Establish working relationships with all appropriate local agenciesin order to utilize local locate resources effectively; (3) Use appropriate State agencies and departments, which at a minimummust include those departments which maintain records of public assistance,wages and employment, unemployment insurance, income taxation, driver'slicenses, vehicle registration, and criminal records; (4) Within 30 working days of referral of the case, application under andSection;302.33 or request for location in accordance with paragraph (b)(8) of thissection, access all appropriate location sources; (5) Transmit appropriate cases to the Federal PLS, including cases whichqualify for submittal to the FPLS and for which State and local locationefforts have been unsuccessful; (6) Within 2 working days of location, initiate necessary action or service;(7) Refer appropriate cases to the IV-D agency of any other State, in accordancewith the requirements of andSection; 303.7 of this Part. The IV-D agencyof such other State shall follow the procedures in paragraphs (b) (1) through(8) of this section for such cases, as necessary except that the respondingState is not required to access the Federal PLS under section (b)(4) ofthis section; (8) Repeat location attempts quarterly in appropriate cases in which previousattempts to locate absent parents or sources of income and/or assets havefailed, but adequate information exists to meet requirements for submittalfor location, in conjunction with quarterly updates of State employmentsecurity files; and (9) If at any point in case processing the absent parent's location orlocation of sources of income and/or assets becomes unknown, refer forlocation services within 5 working days of determining that location isunknown. d. The introductory text of andSection; 303.4 is republished and the sectionis amended by adding new paragraphs (d) and (e) to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishment of support obligations. </ITAG>For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for services underandSection; 302.33 of this chapter, the IV-D agency must: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) Within 30 working days of locating an absent parent or establishingpaternity, establish a support order or file a petition for establishmentof a support order with the court or administrative authority responsiblefor establishment of obligations; (e) If the court or administrative authority dismisses a petition for asupport order without prejudice, the IV-D agency must examine the reasonsfor dismissal, determine when it would be appropriate to seek an orderin the future, and seek a support order at that time. e. Section 303.5 is amended by revising paragraphs (a) and (c) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishment of paternity. </ITAG>(a) For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for servicesunder andSection; 302.33 of this chapter in which paternity has not yet beenestablished, the IV-D agency must: (1) Within one year of locating the alleged father: (i) Establish paternity by court order or other legal process establishedunder State law; (ii) Establish paternity by acknowledgment if under State law such acknowledgmenthas the same legal effect as court-ordered paternity, including the rightto benefits other than child support; or(iii) Exclude the alleged father as a result of genetic tests. (2) In any case where an alleged father is excluded but more than one allegedfather has been identified, the IV-D agency must meet the requirementsset forth in paragraph (a)(1) of this section for each alleged father identified.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) The IV-D agency must identify and use through competitive procurementlaboratories which perform, at reasonable cost, legally and medically acceptablegenetic tests, including blood tests, which tend to identify the fatheror exclude the alleged father. The IV-D agency must make available a listof such laboratories to appropriate courts and law enforcement officials,and to the public upon request. f. Section 303.6 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Enforcement of support obligations. </ITAG>For all cases referred to the IV-D agency or applying for services underandSection; 302.33 in which the obligation to support and the amount of theobligation have been established, the IV-D agency must maintain and usean effective system for: (a) Monitoring compliance with the support obligation; (b) Identifying on the date the parent fails to make payments in an amountequal to the support payable for one month, or on an earlier date in accordancewith State law, those cases in which there is a failure to comply withthe support obligation; and (c) Enforcing the obligation by: (1) Initiating income withholding, in accordance with andSection; 303.100;(2) Initiating any other available enforcement technique, except Federaland State income tax refund offset, as appropriate in accordance with andSection;302.70(b) of this Chapter, within 30 working days of identifying a delinquencyor other support-related noncompliance with the order; (3) Submitting once a year, all cases which meet the certification requirementsfor State income tax refund offset, in accordance with andSection; 303.102and State guidelines developed under andSection; 302.70(b), and for Federalincome tax refund offset, in accordance with the requirements of andSection;303.72 of this part; and (4) In cases where previous enforcement attempts have been unsuccessful,examine the factors which determine the ability to use an enforcement techniquequarterly and initiate appropriate enforcement techniques as appropriatein accordance with the requirements of this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>g. Section 303.7(c) is amended by amending paragraph (c)(4) to replacethe words ``60 days'' with the words ``30 working days'' and by addingthe words ``with the exception of the requirement to access the FederalPLS in andSection; 303.3(b)(4).'' after ``andSection; 303.3 of this part''in paragraph (c)(4)(i). h. A new andSection; 303.9 entitled ``Service of process'' is added to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Service of process. </ITAG>(a) When service of process is necessary at any point in case processing,service of process must be requested within 2 working days of a determinationthat service of process is necessary and must be completed in accordancewith paragraph (b) of this section within the overall timeframes for location,establishment of paternity and support orders and enforcement set forthin this Part; and (b) Process must be served within 10 working days of the request for serviceof process. i. The introductory text of andSection; 303.10(b) is republished and andSection;303.10 is amended by revising paragraphs (a), (b)(5) and (b)(6) to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for case assessment and prioritization. </ITAG>(a) The IV-D agency may implement a case assessment and prioritizationsystem Statewide or in a particular political subdivision of the Stateto manage its caseload. If a IV-D agency implements a case assessment andprioritization system, the IV-D agency must continue to meet the timeframesand case processing standards contained in this Part. (b) In implementing a case assessment and prioritization system, the IV-Dagency must: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(5) Prioritize cases after reviewing all intake information for accuracyand completeness and, if review indicates that additional information isneeded, prioritize only after attempting to verify or secure the informationin accordance with andSection; 303.2. (6) Establish a mechanism for the periodic review of low priority casesin accordance with the standards set forth in Part 303, and for notifyingthe custodial parent in these cases that new information may result ina higher priority for the case. j. A new andSection; 303.11 entitled ``Case closure criteria'' is added toread as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Case closure criteria. </ITAG>(a) The IV-D agency shall establish a system for case closure. (b) In order to be eligible for closure, the case must meet at least oneof the following criteria:(1) In the case of a child who has reached the age of majority, there isno longer a current support order and arrearages are under $150; (2) In the case of a child who has not reached the age of majority, thereis no longer a current support order and arrearages are under $150; (3) The absent parent or putative father is deceased and no further action,including a levy against the estate, can be taken; (4) Paternity cannot be established because: (i) the child is at least 18 years old and action to establish paternityis barred by a statute of limitations which meets the requirements of andSection;302.70(a)(5) of this chapter; (ii) a court or administrative process has excluded the putative fatherand no other putative father can be identified; or (iii) in accordance with andSection; 303.5(b) of this part, the IV-D agencyhas determined that it would not be in the best interests of the childto establish paternity in a case involving incest or forcible rape, orin any case where legal proceedings for adoption are pending; (5) The absent parent's location is unknown, and the State has made regularattempts using multiple sources to locate the absent parent over a three-yearperiod, all of which have been unsuccessful; (6) The absent parent cannot pay support for the duration of the child'sminority because the parent has been institutionalized in a psychiatricfacility for at least five years or is incarcerated with a sentence ofat least 12 years remaining to be served and there is no chance for parole.The State must also determine that no income or assets are available tothe absent parent which could be levied or attached for support; (7) The absent parent is a citizen of, and lives in, a foreign country,does not work for the Federal government or a company with headquartersor offices in the United States, and has no reachable domestic income orassets; and the State has been unable to establish reciprocity with thecountry; (8) The IV-D agency has provided location-only services as requested underandSection; 302.35(c)(3) of this chapter; (9) The non-AFDC custodial parent requests closure of a case and thereis no assignment to the State of arrearages which accrued under a supportorder; or (10) There has been a finding of good cause as set forth at andSection;andSection;302.31(c) and 232.40 through 232.49 of this chapter and the State or localIV-A or IV-E agency has determined that support enforcement may not proceedwithout risk or harm to the child or caretaker relative. (c) In cases meeting the criteria in paragraphs (b) (1) through (7) ofthis section, the State must notify the custodial parent in writing 60calendar days prior to closure of the case of the State's intent to closethe case. If the case is closed, the custodial parent may request at alater date that the case be reopened if there is a change in circumstanceswhich could lead to the establishment of paternity or a support order orenforcement of an order. (d) The IV-D agency must retain all records for cases closed pursuant tothis section for a minimum of three years, in accordance with 45 CFR Part74, subpart D. k. Section 303.20 is amended by revising the introductory language in paragraph(c) and paragraph (c)(7) and adding new paragraph (g) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Minimum organizational and staffing requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) There is an organizational structure and sufficient resources at theState and local level to meet the performance and time standards containedin this part and to provide for the administration or supervision of thefollowing support enforcement functions: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(7) <T3>Enforcement. </T3>Activities to enforce collection of support, includingincome withholding and other available enforcement techniques. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(g) If it is determined as a result of an audit conducted under Part 305of this chapter that a State is not in substantial compliance with therequirements of title IV-D of the Act, the Secretary will evaluate whetherinadequate resources was a major contributing factor and, if necessary,may set resource standards for the State.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 303.30 and 303.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated From 306.50 and 306.51 Respectively] </ITAG>l. Section 306.50 is redesignated as a new andSection; 303.30 and andSection;306.51 is redesignated as a new andSection; 303.31. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 303.52 and 301.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>m. In andSection; 303.52, the definition of ``Political subdivision'' ismoved from paragraph (a) to andSection; 301.1 and andSection; 303.52 is revisedto read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pass-through of incentives to political subdivisions. </ITAG>The State must calculate and promptly pay incentives to political subdivisionsas follows: (a) The State IV-D agency must develop a standard methodology for passingthrough an appropriate share of its incentive payment to those politicalsubdivisions of the State that participate in the costs of the program,taking into account the efficiency and effectiveness of the activitiescarried out under the State plan by those political subdivisions. In orderto reward efficiency and effectiveness, the methodology also may providefor payment of incentives to other political subdivisions of the Statethat administer the program. (b) To ensure that the standard methodology developed by the State reflectslocal participation, the State IV-D agency must submit a draft methodologyto participating political subdivisions for review and comment or use therulemaking process available under State law to receive local input.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.72</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>n. Section 303.72(g)(8) is amended by changing the reference to ``andSection;303.52'' to ``andSection; 304.12.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>o. Section 303.73(a)(1) is amended by changing the reference to ``andSection;303.7(a)(3)'' to ``andSection; 303.7.''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>p. Section 303.100(e)(2) is amended by removing the word ``promptly'' afterthe word ``distributed''.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 303.102</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>q. Section 303.102(g)(1) is amended by removing the words ``Within a reasonabletime period in accordance with State law,'' and capitalizing the word ``a''before the word ``State''. <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 304_[AMENDED] </ITAG>1. The authority citation in Part 304, continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 651 through 655, 657, 1302, 1396a(a)(25),1396b(d)(2), 1396b(o), 1396b(p), and 1396(k).</ITAG>2. Part 304 is amended by adding a new andSection; 304.12, entitled ``Incentivepayments'' and by amending andSection;andSection; 304.20(b)(2), 304.23 and304.26 as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 304.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Incentive payments </ITAG>(a) <T3>Definitions. </T3>For the purposes of this section: ``AFDC collections''means support collections satisfying an assigned support obligation underandSection; 232.11 of this title or section 471(a)(17) of the Act, includingcollections treated in accordance with paragraph (b)(4)(ii) of this section.``Non-AFDC Collections'' means support collections, on behalf of individualsreceiving services under this title, satisfying a support obligation whichhas not been assigned under andSection; 232.11 of this title or section 471(a)(17)of the Act, including collections treated in accordance with paragraph(b)(4)(ii) of this section and collections made under andSection; 302.51(e)of this chapter. ``Total IV-D administrative costs'' means total IV-D administrative expendituresclaimed by a State in a specified fiscal year adjusted in accordance withparagraphs (b)(4)(iii), (b)(4)(iv) and (b)(4)(v) of this section.(b) <T3>Incentive payments to States. </T3>Effective October l, 1985, the Officeshall compute incentive payments for States for a fiscal year in recognitionof AFDC collections and of non-AFDC collections. (1) A portion of a State's incentive payment shall be computed as a percentageof the State's AFDC collections, and a portion of the incentive paymentshall be computed as a percentage of its non-AFDC collections. The percentagesare determined separately for AFDC and non-AFDC portions of the incentive.The percentages are based on the ratio of the State's AFDC collectionsto the State's total administrative costs and the State's non-AFDC collectionsto the State's total administrative costs in accordance with the followingschedule:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,i1,s50,8 </C><T4>Ratio of Collections to Total IV-D Administrative Costs</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Percent of collection paid as an incentive</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Less than 1.4<D>6.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 1.4<D>6.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 1.6<D>7.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 1.8<D>7.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.0<D>8.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.2<D>8.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.4<D>9.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.6<D>9.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">At least 2.8<D>10.0</D></ITAG></ITAG> (2) The ratios of the State's AFDC and non-AFDC collections to total IV-Dadministrative costs will be truncated at one decimal place. (3) The portion of the incentive payment paid to a State for a fiscal yearin recognition of its non-AFDC collections is limited to the percentageof the portion of the incentive payment paid for that fiscal year in recognitionof its AFDC collections, as follows: (i) 100 percent in fiscal years 1986 and 1987; (ii) 105 percent in fiscal year 1988; (iii) 110 percent in fiscal year 1989; and (iv) 115 percent in fiscal year 1990 and thereafter. (4) In calculating the amount of incentive payments, the following conditionsapply: (i) Only those AFDC and non-AFDC collections distributed and expendituresclaimed by the State in the fiscal year shall be used to determine theincentive payment payable for that fiscal year; (ii) Support collected by one State on behalf of individuals receivingIV-D services in another State shall be treated as having been collectedin full by each State; (iii) Fees paid by individuals, recovered costs, and program income suchas interest earned on collections shall be deducted from total IV-D administrativecosts; (iv) At the option of the State, laboratory costs incurred in determiningpaternity may be excluded from total IV-D administrative costs; and (v) Effective January l, 1990, amounts expended by the State in carryingout a special project under section 455(e) of the Act shall not be includedin the State's total IV-D administrative costs. (vi) Costs of demonstration projects for evaluating model procedures forreviewing child support awards under section 103(e) of Pub. L. 100-485shall not be included in the State's total IV-D administrative costs. (c) <T3>Payment of incentives. </T3>(1) The Office will estimate the totalincentive payment that each State will receive for the upcoming fiscalyear. (2) Each State will include one-quarter of the estimated total paymentin its quarterly collection report which will reduce the amount that wouldotherwise be paid to the Federal government to reimburse its share of assistancepayments under andSection;andSection; 302.51 and 302.52 of this chapter. (3) Following the end of a fiscal year, the Office will calculate the actualincentive payment the State should have received based on the reports submittedfor that fiscal year. If adjustments to the estimate made under paragraph(c)(1) of this section are necessary, the State's IV-A grant award wi11be reduced or increased because of over- or under-estimates for prior quartersand for other adjustments. (4) For FY 1985, the Office will calculate a State's incentive paymentbased on AFDC collections retained by the State and paid to the familyunder andSection; 302.51(b)(1) of this chapter. (5) For FY 1986 and 1987, a State will receive the higher of the amountdue it under the incentive system and Federal matching rate in effect asof FY 1986 or 80 percent of what it would have received under the incentivesystem and Federal matching rate in effect during FY 1985.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 304.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>b. Section 304.20(b)(2) is amended by substituting the word ``genetic''for the word ``blood'' wherever it appears and changing the reference to``andSection; 303.5(b)'' to ``andSection; 303.5(c)''.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 304.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>c. Section 304.23(g) is amended by removing the words ``, Subpart A,''after the words ``Part 306''.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 304.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>d. Section 304.26(b) is amended by changing the reference to ``andSection;303.52'' to ``andSection; 304.12''.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 306_[AMENDED]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 306.1 and 301.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 306.50 and 306.51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Redesignated as andSection;andSection; 303.30 and 303.31]  </ITAG>Part 306 is amended by transferring the definitions of ``Medicaid agency''and ``Medicaid'' from andSection;306.1 to andSection; 301.1, transferring thecontents of Subpart B_Required IV-D Activities, which consists of andSection;andSection;306.50 and 306.51, to Part 303 and redesignating them as new andSection;andSection;303.30 and 303.31, respectively, and the part is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 306_OPTIONAL COOPERATIVE AGREEMENTS FOR MEDICAL SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.0 Scope of this part. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.2 Cooperative agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.10 Functions to be performed under a cooperative agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.11 Administrative requirements of cooperative agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.20 Prior approval of cooperative agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.21 Subsidiary cooperative agreements with courts and law enforcementofficials. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.22 Purchase of service agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">306.30 Source of funds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>42 U.S.C. 652, 1302, 1396a(a)(25), 1396b(d)(2), 1396b(o),1396b(p), and 1396(k). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.0</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of this part.</ITAG>This part defines the requirements for an optional cooperative aqreementbetween the IV-D agency and the Medicaid agency for the purpose of enforcingmedical support obligations under section 1912 of the Act. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cooperative agreement. </ITAG>The cooperative agreement between the IV-D agency and the Medicaid agencyshall be a written agreement for the IV-D agency to assist the Medicaidagency by securing and enforcing the medical support obligation of an absentparent to a child for whom an assignment of medical support rights hasbeen executed under 42 CFR 433.146. The functions that the IV-D agencymay perform under the cooperative agreement are set forth in andSection;306.10. The administrative requirements are set forth at andSection; 306.11.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Functions to be performed under a cooperative agreement. </ITAG>The functions that the IV-D agency may perform under a cooperative agreementwith the Medicaid agency are limited to one or any combination of the followingactivities. The agency may: (a) Receive referrals from the Medicaid agency. (b) Locate the absent parent, using the State Parent Locator Service andthe Federal Parent Locator Service, as needed. (c) Establish paternity if necessary. (d) Determine whether the parent has a health insurance policy or planthat covers the child. (e) Obtain sufficient information about the health insurance policy orplan to permit the filing of a claim with the insurer. (f) File a claim with the insurer; or transmit the necessary informationto the Medicaid agency, or to the appropriate State agency or fiscal agentfor the filing of the claim; or require the absent parent to file a claim.(g) Secure health insurance coverage through court or administrative order.(h) Take direct action against the absent parent to recover amounts necessaryto reimburse medical assistance payments when the absent parent does nothave health insurance and the amounts collected will not reduce the absentparent's ability to pay child support. (i) Receive medical support collections. (j) Distribute the collections as required by 42 CFR 433.154 includingcalculation and payment of the incentives provided for by 42 CFR 433.153.(k) Perform other functions as may be specified by instructions issuedby the Office of Child Support Enforcement. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administrative requirements of cooperative agreements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Organizational structure.</T3> The cooperative agreement must: (1) Describe the organizational structure of the unit or units within theIV-D agency that are responsible for medical support enforcement activities.(2) List the medical support enforcement functions that are to be performedoutside of the IV-D agency with the name of the organization responsiblefor performance. (3) Provide that the IV-D agency shall have responsibility for securingcompliance with the requirements of the cooperative agreement by individualsor agencies outside the IV-D agency performing medical support enforcementfunctions. (b) <T3>Maintenance of records.</T3> The cooperative agreement must specifythat the IV-D agency will establish and maintain case records of medicalsupport enforcement activities in accordance with the provisions of andSection;302.15 of this chapter. (c) <T3>Safeguarding information.</T3> The cooperative agreement must providethat the use or disclosure of information concerning applicants for, orrecipients of, medical support enforcement services is subject to the limitationsin andSection; 303.21 of this chapter. (d) <T3>Fiscal policies and accountability.</T3> (1) The cooperative agreementmust provide that the IV-D agency will maintain an accounting system andsupporting fiscal records adequate to assure that claims for reimbursementfrom the Medicaid agency are in accordance with applicable Federal requirementsin 45 CFR Part 74. (2) The cooperative agreements must provide for the establishment of amethod for properly allocating those costs that cannot be directly chargedto the medical support enforcement effort. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prior approval of cooperative agreements. </ITAG>(a) Prior to implementation, the IV-D agency must submit two copies ofany cooperative agreement entered into under this part to the RegionalRepresentative for approval. (b) The Regional Representative will review the cooperative agreement forconformity with the requirements of this part and 42 CFR 433.152. (c) The Regional Representative will promptly notify the State of approvalor disapproval. The State may consider the agreement approved if notificationis not received within 60 days after the agreement is received by the RegionalRepresentative. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Subsidiary cooperative agreements with courts and law enforcementofficials. </ITAG>The IV-D agency will enter into subsidiary written cooperative agreementswith appropriate courts and law enforcement officials to the extent necessaryto perform those functions specified in the cooperative agreement betweenthe IV-D agency and the Medicaid agency. These agreements must be madein accordance with the requirements of andSection; 302.34 (Cooperative agreements).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purchase of service agreements. </ITAG>The IV-D agency will enter into written purchase of service agreementsto the extent necessary to fulfill the requirements of its cooperativeagreement with the Medicaid agency. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 306.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Source of funds. </ITAG>The cooperative agreement must specify that the IV-D agency will receivefull reimbursement from the Medicaid agency for all medical support enforcementactivities performed under the agreement. (See andSection; 306.11(d) forrequirements on fiscal policies and accountability.) <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 307_[Amended] </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 307 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 42 U.S.C. 652 through 658, 664, 666, 667 and 1302.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 307.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>2. Section 307.10 is amended by changing the reference in paragraph (a)(2)(xiii)to ``45 CFR Part 306'' to`` andSection;andSection; 303.30 and 303.31''.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-9354 Filed 4-18-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4150-04-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>